Kathleen Sebelius - U.S. Governor - Biography.comSubscribe to NewsletterAboutKathleen Sebelius Biography.comU.S. Governor(1948–)120SHARESQuick FactsNameKathleen SebeliusOccupationU.S. GovernorBirth DateMay 15, 1948 (age 69)EducationUniversity of Kansas, Summit Country Day School, Trinity Washington UniversityPlace of BirthCincinnati, OhioOriginallyKathleen GilliganZodiac SignTaurusCite This PageWhen Kathleen Sebelius, daughter of a former Ohio governor, was elected governor of Kansas, they became the first father-daughter governors in U.S. history.IN THESE GROUPSFamous People Born on May 15Famous University of Kansas AlumniFamous People Who Held Political OfficeFamous People in U.S. PoliticsShow All GroupsFamous People Born in 1948Famous People Named KathleenFamous People Born in OhioFamous People Named SebeliusFamous Summit Country Day School AlumniFamous People Born in CincinnatiFamous U.S. GovernorsFamous DemocratsFamous TaureansFamous People Born in United StatesFamous Trinity Washington University AlumniSynopsisKathleen Sebelius was born May 15, 1948, in Cincinnati, Ohio. She was director of the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (1977–1987). As a Democrat, Sebelius entered politics as a member of the Kansas House of Representatives for eight years, from 1986 to 1994. She then served as the Kansas Insurance Commissioner from 1994 to 2002. She was elected Governor of Kansas in 2002 and re-elected in 2006. In 2009, Sebelius joined the administration of President Barack Obama as the head of the Department of Health and Human Services. She resigned from the post in 2014.Early LifePolitician and Governor of Kansas. Born Kathleen Gilligan on May 15, 1948, in Cincinnati, Ohio. She is the daughter of former Ohio Governor John J. Gilligan. When Kathleen was elected Governor of Kansas, they became the first father-daughter governors in U.S. history. Raised Roman Catholic, Kathleen attended Summit Country Day School, a Roman Catholic secondary school. She graduated from Trinity Washington University, a Roman Catholic university in Washington, D.C., with a B.A. degree in 1970. She earned a Master's Degree in Public Administration from the University of Kansas in 1977.Political CareerIn 1974, Kathleen married K. Gary Sebelius, a federal magistrate judge and the son of a former Republican U.S. Representative, and moved to Kansas. They have two sons, Ned was born in 1982 and John was born in 1985. Sebelius worked as an aide with the Kansas Department of Corrections (1975-77) and earned a Master's Degree in Public Administration from the University of Kansas in 1977. She was also the director of the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (1977-87). As a Democrat, Sebelius entered politics as a member of the Kansas House of Representatives for eight years, from 1986 to 1994. She then served as the Kansas Insurance Commissioner from 1994 to 2002. She was elected Governor of Kansas in 2002 and re-elected in 2006. In 2009, Sebelius became the secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services. She had been nominated for the post by President Barack Obama. During her time in the position, Sebelius faced some challenges as the president's Affordable Care Act proved to be politically divisive. She especially came under fire in October 2013 after a new government website regarding health insurance, HealthCare.gov, debuted with serious technical problems. Many Republican lawmakers, including Paul Ryan, called for her to resign. She remained on the job until the following April. In her resignation address, Sebelius described her health care reform efforts as "the most meaningful work of my life." After leaving her position with the Obama administration, Sebelius was rumored to be a possible Democratic senatorial candidate in Kansas. She rejected this idea through a spokesperson, according to the Huffington Post, but remained involved in the ongoing health care debate through public speaking.Fact CheckWe strive for accuracy and fairness. If you see something that doesn't look right, contact us!Citation InformationArticle TitleKathleen Sebelius Biography.comAuthorBiography.com EditorsWebsite NameThe Biography.com websiteURLhttps://www.biography.com/people/kathleen-sebelius-354546Access Date{{$root.currentTime | date:'MMMM d, yyyy'}}PublisherA&E Television NetworksLast UpdatedMay 23, 2015Original Published Daten/a120SHARESBIO NEWSLETTERSign up to receive updates from BIO and A+E Networks.                         Why Kathleen Sebelius’s political career is (probably) over - The Washington Post                                                                       2         Desktop notifications are on   | Turn off      Get breaking news alerts from  The Washington Post   Turn on desktop notifications?  Yes Not now    It looks like you've previously blocked notifications. Please update your browser permissions to allow them.                   Subscribe       Account Profile Newsletters & Alerts Gift Subscriptions Contact Us Help Desk              Accessibility for screenreader                 Share on Facebook  Share on Twitter  Share on Google Plus  Share via Email  Share on LinkedIn  Share on Pinterest  Share on Tumblr           Resize Text Print Article  Comments             The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                                   The Fix   Why Kathleen Sebelius’s political career is (probably) over               The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                 By Sean Sullivan  By Sean Sullivan   April 11, 2014  Follow @WaPoSean    Six years ago, Kathleen Sebelius was a rising Democratic star. She exits the national stage today as something very different: A politically wounded figure whose nearly three decade-long run in elected or appointed office has almost certainly come to an end.    Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius. (AP Photo/Susan Walsh)  Sebelius is resigning as President Obama's Health and Human Services Secretary after the most turbulent seven months of her tenure. As she ponders her next move, Sebelius will have to come to grips with the reality that both nationally and back home in the state where she was once wildly popular, she's become a symbol of the Obama's administration's most polarizing policy. "Kathleen Sebelius may have a future in the private sector but her public office service is over," said Kansas Republican Party Chairman Kelly Arnold. "Voters in Kansas have never supported the idea of Obamacare and having Sebelius as CEO of it has turned Kansans away for any support for her." The story of Sebelius, 65, is a cautionary tale about the risks associated with joining a presidential cabinet, which is consistently a coveted perch for many pols. Once looked upon as a potential vice presidential candidate, Sebelius now arguably embodies the problematic implementation of Obamacare more than anyone not named Barack Obama. And that will make a return to elected office in Kansas -- should she want to pursue it -- extremely difficult. "I think she has no ambitions in Kansas electoral politics," said University of Kansas political scientist Burdett Loomis, who worked for Sebelius when she was governor. "The last small opportunity would have been to run for the Senate against Pat Roberts (R), and that simply wasn't going to happen." Former governors often make good U.S. Senate recruits. But Kansas has not elected a Democratic senator since 1932 and this year's race has moved too far along for her to conceivably jump in against Roberts. Plus, he's a family friend. (Faced with a conservative primary challenger, Roberts has been forced to adopt a hostile posture toward Sebelius despite their long-standing relationship. He called on her to resign last year, a testament to how much opposition she inspires among conservative voters.) The next opportunity, in theory, would come in 2016, when Sen. Jerry Moran (R-Kan.) faces reelection. A run then would present Sebelius with deep challenges, not the least of which is rehabilitating her image with the decidedly conservative Kansas electorate. A recent poll showed the majority of Kansas voters held an unfavorable opinion of her. She could technically run for governor again, but this year's race is well underway and Democrats are excited about Paul Davis, a rising star state legislator from whom Sebelius has campaigned. So a run for her old job would be at least four years away. Still, having been governor and HHS secretary means that Sebelius has cultivated powerful relationships and may reemerge as a high-profile figure in a non-political capacity. Some wager that she may well follow the path of other cabinet secretaries with similar resumes who moved on to take on high-profile leadership positions at leading universities. "In light of the fact that shes been a governor and secretary of HHS, it seems to me that following in the footsteps of former HHS secretary [Donna] Shalala or former homeland security secretary [Janet] Napolitano kind of makes sense," said Jim Manley, a former aide to Senate Majority Leader Harry M. Reid (D-Nev.). Many Democrats feel that the health-care law's popularity will grow in the coming years, thereby vindicating the administration officials who were pilloried for its problems. In the case of Sebelius, who Obama praised Friday for an "historic accomplishment," that would be welcome news. For now, though, she exits the spotlight in worse political shape than she entered it.           politics  the-fix Dallas shooting updates News and analysis on the deadliest day for police since 9/11. post_newsletter353 follow-dallas false endOfArticle false          Please provide a valid email address.           Sign up      You’re all set!   See all newsletters      false     The story must be told. Your subscription supports journalism that matters.   Try 1 month for 99¢         politics  the-fix Orlando Shooting Updates News and analysis on the deadliest mass shooting in U.S. history. post_newsletter348 follow-orlando true endOfArticle false          Please provide a valid email address.           Sign up      You’re all set!   See all newsletters      true     The story must be told. Your subscription supports journalism that matters.   Try 1 month for 99¢              Comments           Share on FacebookShare       Share on TwitterTweet     Share via Email                  Sean Sullivan has covered national politics for The Washington Post since 2012.  Follow @WaPoSean                        Show Comments       Discussion Policy     Comments       SuperFan Badge SuperFan badge holders consistently post smart, timely comments about Washington area sports and teams. More about badges | Request a badge   Culture Connoisseur Badge Culture Connoisseurs consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on the arts, lifestyle and entertainment. More about badges | Request a badge   Fact Checker Badge Fact Checkers contribute questions, information and facts to The Fact Checker. More about badges | Request a badge   Washingtologist Badge Washingtologists consistently post thought-provoking, timely comments on events, communities, and trends in the Washington area. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Writer Badge This commenter is a Washington Post editor, reporter or producer.   Post Forum Badge Post Forum members consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on politics, national and international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Weather Watcher Badge Weather Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on climates and forecasts. More about badges | Request a badge   World Watcher Badge World Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Contributor Badge This commenter is a Washington Post contributor. Post contributors aren’t staff, but may write articles or columns. In some cases, contributors are sources or experts quoted in a story. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Recommended Washington Post reporters or editors recommend this comment or reader post.   You must be logged in to report a comment. Sign in here   You must be logged in to recommend a comment. Sign in here   Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.All comments are posted in the All Comments tab. More about badgesGet a badge  To pause and restart automatic updates, click "Live" or "Paused". If paused, you'll be notified of the number of additional comments that have come in.    Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.          Spam Offensive Disagree Off-Topic        Among the criteria for featured comments: likes by users, replies by users, previous history of valuable commenting, and selection by moderators.                 Facebook  Twitter  Reddit     StumbleUpon  Digg                           Most Read        1    Analysis  Anthony Scaramucci’s vulgar New Yorker interview is beyond words       2    Analysis  A trifecta of criticism for President Trump with this message: Change your behavior       3   Boy Scouts leader apologizes for Trump speech’s ‘political rhetoric’       4    Analysis  Republicans are starting to draw red lines on Trump firing Sessions and Mueller       5    Analysis  The Trump White House just went full reality TV            The story must be told. Subscribe to The Washington Post.   Subscribe                   Inside 'Trump Revealed' Read stories based on reporting for “Trump Revealed,” a broad, comprehensive biography of the life of the president. Reporting archive: Trump’s financial records, depositions and interview transcripts          politics  the-fix     Success! Check your inbox for details.        Please enter a valid email address    You might also like:                 Sign Up No Thanks   See all newsletters        washingtonpost.com © 1996-2017 The Washington Post   Help and Contact Us Terms of Service Privacy Policy Print Products Terms of Sale Digital Products Terms of Sale Submissions and Discussion Policy RSS Terms of Service Ad Choices        Close video player   Now Playing                                                              









Kathleen Sebelius - Page 1 | GOP

















































Shortcuts
Platform
Rules & Resolutions
GOP Groups
Blog
Store
Action Center
State Leadership
Press Releases
Research
News & Video



Contribute



Signin with email





























             Contribute
           





Follow @GOP





Follow @GOP






Connect:







                    Contribute
                  

Action Center
Blog








Search
                                










|



                                          Sign Up
                                    







Menu
                              

Shortcuts
Platform
Rules & Resolutions
GOP Groups
Blog
Store
Action Center
State Leadership
Press Releases
Research
News & Video



Contribute



Signin with email



























QUICK DONATE
Donate now with a single click.





            Go to full donation form instead.
          








Kathleen Sebelius

As Health and Human Services Secretary, Kathleen Sebelius was one of the key architects behind ObamaCare. Under her watch, ObamaCare failed to meet many deadlines. She oversaw the Healthcare.gov crash launched the exchange to the public before it was close to ready. After a tumultuous five year stint as Secretary, Sebelius finally stepped down.








Filter BY
All Content(22)
Research(17)
Blog Posts(5)





Research
Sebelius Shown The Door
Kathleen Sebelius - April 11, 2014 
Health And Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius "Is Resigning, Ending A Stormy Five-Year Tenure Marred By The Disastrous Rollout" Of ObamaCare. "Kathleen Sebelius, the health and human services secretary, is resigning, ending a stormy five-year tenure marred by the disastrous rollout of President Obama's signature legislative achievement, the Affordable Care Act."... Continue Reading »




Research
The Obama Administration’s Misleading Rhetoric Tries To Hide The Truth: ObamaCare Is Unaffordable
Kathleen Sebelius - March 25, 2014 
Recently, Health And Human Services (HHS) Secretary Kathleen Sebelius Penned An Op-Ed That A Texan Got Health Care “For Less Than $80 A Month.” “Sebelius, the U.S. secretary of Health and Human Services, said in an opinion column published in the March 18, 2014, Austin American-Statesman: ‘On a recent visit to the Lone Star State, I met Mark Sullivan, a 31-year-old software developer. Though he was eager to start his own business, the thought of fending for himself without his employer-based health coverage made him hesitate. ‘But then Mark researched his options on HealthCare.gov. You can imagine his excitement when he found a good plan that includes dental, for less than $80 a month.’ That column touting Sullivan’s experience also appeared in the Dallas Morning News, San Antonio Express-News, El Paso Times and McAllen Monitor.” (W. Gardner Selby, “On HealthCare.Gov, Texan Mark Sullivan ‘Found A Good’ Health Insurance ‘Plan That Includes Dental, For Less Than $80 A Month,” PolitiFact, 3/24/14)... Continue Reading »




Research
Kathleen “Unaccountable” Sebelius
Kathleen Sebelius - October 30, 2013 
Before Congress Today, HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius Will Try To Deflect Blame Onto Contractors For ObamaCare's Disastrous Rollout. "Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius will tell a House committee tomorrow the site's botched rollout was the result of contractors failing to live up to expectations - not bad management at HHS, as the contractors suggested. Sebelius blames a 'subset' of contractors who 'have not met expectations' for the website's problems in an opening statement she'll deliver Wednesday to the House Energy and Commerce Committee." ... Continue Reading »




Research
Fireable Offense
Kathleen Sebelius - October 16, 2013 
Former Obama Press Secretary Robert Gibbs: "I Hope They Fire Some People That Were In Charge Of Making Sure This Thing Was Supposed To Work." GIBBS: "But, boy, if they don't get these glitches figured out fast, people aren't going to come back for visits 15 through 18. And I will say this. I hope they are working day and night to get this done. And when they get it fixed, I hope they fire some people that were in charge of making sure this thing was supposed to work. We knew there were going to be some glitches. But these were glitches that go, quite frankly, way beyond the pale of what should be expected."... Continue Reading »




Blog
ICYMI: Chairman Priebus: “It's time to fire Secretary Sebelius”
Kathleen Sebelius - October 15, 2013 
“If Apple launched a major new product that functioned as badly as ObamaCare’s online insurance marketplace, the tech world would be calling for [CEO] Tim Cook’s head.”... Continue Reading »




Blog
It's time to fire Secretary Sebelius
Kathleen Sebelius - October 15, 2013 
“If Apple launched a major new product that functioned as badly as ObamaCare’s online insurance marketplace, the tech world would be calling for [CEO] Tim Cook’s head.”... Continue Reading »




Research
Kathleen Sebelius’s Rollout Malpractice
Kathleen Sebelius - October 15, 2013 
THEN: Health And Human Services (HHS) Secretary Kathleen Sebelius: "So We Are On Track To Flip The Switch On October First And Say To People Come On And Sign Up." SEBELIUS: "No, I think we're on target. The data hub has been built and is ready to go. We are testing information flows back and forth. We have got the call center up and running. We have relaunched the website, were having outreach meetings, so we are on track to flip the switch on October 1st and say to people come on and sign up and as you said it is a six-month open enrollment period, so between October 1st and the 31st of March we hope to reach about 7 million people across the country and have them begin to engage and enroll in affordable health care, some for the first time ever."... Continue Reading »




Blog
Fire Sebelius
Kathleen Sebelius - October 14, 2013 
Apparently there’s bipartisan agreement that someone must be fired for the ObamaCare launch. Today former Obama Press Secretary Robert Gibbs called the launch “excruciatingly embarrassing” and called on someone to be fired. Last week RNC Chairman Priebus began calling for Health and Human Services Secretary Sebelius – who has been traveling the country touting ObamaCare’s successes for years – to be fired and since then two elected officials have joined.... Continue Reading »




Research
ObamaCare By The Numbers
Kathleen Sebelius - July 15, 2013 




Research
More Questions Than Answers From Sebelius Hearing
Kathleen Sebelius - June 5, 2013 
HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius Was On Defense Yesterday, Answering Questions For The First Time Since News Broke That She Was Soliciting Funds For ObamaCare. "Appearing before Congress for the first time since news broke about her calls to drum up support from outside groups, Sebelius on Tuesday had a slew of defenses ready to go."... Continue Reading »




Research
Will Kathleen Sebelius Come Clean On The HHS Scandal?
Kathleen Sebelius - June 4, 2013 
Today, Health And Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius Will Testify Before The U.S. House Committee On Education And The Workforce.... Continue Reading »




Research
The Sebelius Shakedown 
Kathleen Sebelius - May 30, 2013 
Kathleen Sebelius Is "Seeking Assistance From Companies In The Health Care Field" To Implement ObamaCare. "In telephone calls that began around March 23, officials say, Obama's top healthcare adviser has been seeking assistance from companies in the healthcare field and other industries as well as from healthcare providers, patient advocacy groups, churches and other charitable organizations." (David Morgan, "Obama's Health Secretary Seeks Donations From Companies For Healthcare Law," Reuters, 5/11/13)... Continue Reading »




Research
Democrats’ Worst Fear For 2014: ObamaCare?
Kathleen Sebelius - April 26, 2013 
Democrat Pollsters Are Voicing Their Concern That ObamaCare May “Hurt Democrats In 2014.”  “In an informal poll of Democratic insiders, many of whom shepherded Democrats thorough the dismal 2010 elections, almost all voiced concern about the potential for the issue to hurt Democrats in 2014.”... Continue Reading »




Research
Destination - TRNWRK
Kathleen Sebelius - April 24, 2013 
Democrat Senator Max Baucus (D-MT): “I Just See A Huge Train Wreck Coming Down.” MAX BAUCUS: “‘I just see a huge train wreck coming down, you and I have discussed this many times, and I don't see any results yet.’” ... Continue Reading »




Research
Designing A “Train Wreck”
Kathleen Sebelius - April 22, 2013 
Former Obama Health Care Adviser Zeke Emanuel Says ObamaCare Uncertainty Is Driving Up Health Care Premiums. ZEKE EMANUEL: “The last thing, of course, is what happens with costs which may be the biggest question of all. Can the premiums be kept relatively stable and not growing at, you know, 10%, 12%.  The first year is filled with uncertainty. No one including the insurers, the hospitals, the federal government knows how many people are going to come in, are they going to be a broad representation of people who are uninsured or are only the sick going to go in? That is a big fear of the insurance companies. That's why you're seeing the increase in rates. They're worried, well, we'll only get the sick, we're going to pay a lot of money so we're increasing the rates as an uncertainty.”... Continue Reading »




Research
Visions Of 2010
Kathleen Sebelius - April 8, 2013 
Democrat Pollsters Are Voicing Their Concern That ObamaCare May "Hurt Democrats In 2014." "In an informal poll of Democratic insiders, many of whom shepherded Democrats thorough the dismal 2010 elections, almost all voiced concern about the potential for the issue to hurt Democrats in 2014."... Continue Reading »




Research
New Quinnipiac University Poll Finds That Pennsylvania Voters Share An Overall Disdain For ObamaCare
Kathleen Sebelius - March 14, 2013 
53 Percent Of Pennsylvanian Voters Disapprove Of ObamaCare. "A total of 53 percent of Pennsylvania voters 'somewhat disapprove' or 'strongly disapprove' of the 2010 Affordable Care Act, while 37 percent 'strongly approve' or 'somewhat approve.'" ( Quinnipiac University Poll, 1,116 RV, MoE 2.9%, 3/6-11/13)... Continue Reading »




Research
They Said It!
Kathleen Sebelius - March 8, 2013 
Obama's Former Economic Adviser Jared Bernstein Admits That ObamaCare "Is Not A Jobs Program"



IFrame

OBAMA'S FORMER ECONOMIC ADVISER CONFIRMED THE FEDERAL RESERVE'S FINDINGS THAT OBAMACARE IS HAMPERING JOB CREATION

When Asked If ObamaCare Was Restraining Job Creation, Former Obama Economic Adviser Jared Bernstein Responded That It Was Making Him "Nervous" And That It Was Something To Watch For. CNBC'S STEVE LEISMAN: "How many times have we heard of the 'Beige Book?' Specific comments from Federal Reserve districts, one where Lacker is the president and one where Evans is the president so there isn't going to be any bias there. Specifically saying the Affordable Care Act is restraining hiring. Jared, I wonder how you will respond to that?" FORMER OBAMA ECONOMIC ADVISER JARED BERNSTEIN: "I'm a little nervous about that, Austan made that point and I think there is something to it. I think it's something worth watching." (CNBC's " Squawk Box," 3/8/13)... Continue Reading »




Research
Obama Doesn’t Care
Kathleen Sebelius - March 7, 2013 
The Federal Reserve Finds That ObamaCare Is Responsible For Layoffs And High Health Care Costs

OBAMACARE IS FORCING EMPLOYERS TO LAY OFF WORKERS AND CUT BACK ON HIRING

"The Federal Reserve On Wednesday Released An Edition Of Its So-Called 'Beige Book,' That Said The 2010 Health Care Law Is Being Cited As A Reason For Layoffs And A Slowdown In Hiring." (Pete Kasperowicz, "Fed: Obama's Health Law Leading To Layoffs," The Hill's Health Watch, 3/6/13)... Continue Reading »




Blog
Gallup Roundup: America Will Be “Worse Off” Under ObamaCare
Kathleen Sebelius - July 16, 2012 




Research
#ObamaCare: IPAB
Kathleen Sebelius - March 22, 2012 
ObamaCare Created The Independent Payment Advisory Board (IPAB) “To Come Up With Ways To Cut Medicare Spending If It Grows Too Fast.” “That’s the job description for the 15 members of the Independent Payment Advisory Board — the new panel created by President Barack Obama’s health care law to come up with ways to cut Medicare spending if it grows too fast.” ... Continue Reading »




Blog
HHS Secretary To Make Announcement At Business That Has No Confidence In ObamaCare
Kathleen Sebelius - July 11, 2011 
This morning at 11 am, HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius is set to announce regulations on ObamaCare’s health insurance exchanges at the Frager’s Hardware Store on Capitol Hill in Washington, DC. ... Continue Reading »




Previous
1
Next





Filter
All Content(22)
Research(17)
Blog Posts(5)










Connect With Us
Republican National Committee

Follow @GOP




Follow @GOP


Follow GOP
Chairwoman Ronna McDaniel

Follow @GOPChairwoman



Our GOP

Republican Platform
National GOP Leadership
State GOP Leadership
History of the GOP
RNC Rules & Resolutions
RNC Counsel's Office

GOP Groups

Black Republican Activists
GOP Hispanics
RNC Women
GOP Faith
Asian Pacific Americans
GOP Millennials
Veterans & Military Families



Action Center

Petitions
Surveys
Political Education Signup
Jobs & Internships
Volunteer

Issues




News & Videos

Blog
Press Releases
Research
Videos





Contribute









310 First Street SE, Washington, DC 20003

202-863-8500





© Copyright 2017 All Rights Reserved - Privacy Policy



                By providing your phone number, you are consenting to receive calls and SMS/MMS msgs, including autodialed and automated calls and texts, to that number from the Republican National Committee. Msg&data rates may apply. Terms & conditions/privacy policy apply 80810-info.com.
              


Paid for by the Republican National Committee. Not Authorized By Any Candidate Or Candidate's Committee. www.gop.com






Action Center



                      Contribute
                    

Read Blog




                  By providing your phone number, you are consenting to receive calls and SMS/MMS msgs, including autodialed and automated calls and texts, to that number from the Republican National Committee. Msg&data rates may apply. Terms & conditions/privacy policy apply 80810-info.com.
                


Paid for by the Republican National Committee. Not Authorized By Any Candidate Or Candidate's Committee. www.gop.com





                X
            

          This site is not guaranteed to work correctly with cookies disabled.  Please turn them back on to achieve the expected browsing experience.
        




















THANKS FOR VOTING!¡


Please check your email to claim your FREE sticker




2016 PRESIDENTIAL STRAWPOLL





Select your option
Value 1
Value 2
Value 3




CAST YOUR VOTE
                



Get a Free Sticker!



Continue to GOP.com »


















Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      



Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






                           Kathleen Sebelius: The Affordable Care Act has made the U.S. health-care system stronger - The Washington Post                                                                      2         Desktop notifications are on   | Turn off      Get breaking news alerts from  The Washington Post   Turn on desktop notifications?  Yes Not now    It looks like you've previously blocked notifications. Please update your browser permissions to allow them.                    Subscribe       Account Profile Newsletters & Alerts Gift Subscriptions Contact Us Help Desk              Accessibility for screenreader                Share on Facebook  Share on Twitter  Share on Google Plus  Share via Email  Share on LinkedIn  Share on Pinterest  Share on Tumblr           Resize Text Print Article  Comments             The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                                    Opinions Kathleen Sebelius: The Affordable Care Act has made the U.S. health-care system stronger            The inside track on Washington politics.     Be the first to know about new   stories from PowerPost. Sign up to follow, and we’ll e-mail you free updates as they’re published.    You’ll receive free e-mail news updates each time a new story is published.    You’re all set!       Sign up   *Invalid email address   Got it   Got it                By Kathleen Sebelius  By Kathleen Sebelius  July 9, 2012       Kathleen Sebelius is secretary of health and human services.   The Supreme Court decision upholding the Affordable Care Act was a turning point in the health-care debate, a chance to stop refighting old political battles and move forward with implementing and improving a law that is already lowering health-care costs and providing more security for millions of American families. Instead, congressional Republicans will spend Wednesday staging yet another repeal vote. Fortunately for those Americans whose health and finances depend on protections in the law, the vote is only symbolic. But it’s worth setting the record straight about some false claims that have recently resurfaced. One claim is that the Affordable Care Act is driving up Americans’ health-care costs. The facts tell a different story. In the decade before the law was passed, national health expenditures increased about 7 percent a year. But in the past two years, those increases have dropped to less than 4 percent per year, saving Americans more than $220 billion. And that trend is expected to continue, with health-care costs projected to stay level as a share of gross domestic product from 2009 all the way through 2013.  You can see the same trend with premiums. Between 2000 and 2009, the average family premium more than doubled, from $6,438 to $13,375, an annual increase of 8.1 percent. From 2009 to 2011, family premiums still rose — but at a rate 25 percent lower. That generated savings of more than $1,200 per family, a trend of lower premium increases that independent experts such as Mercer, the human resources consultant, and the nonprofit National Business Group on Health project will continue. And the law will provide even more relief in the years to come, including a tax cut averaging $4,000 for 18 million middle-class Americans — a tax break that repeal would eliminate. Another falsehood repeated by opponents of the law is that it is putting a greater burden on small businesses. Again, the facts show that the opposite is true. Small-business owners were struggling in the health insurance market long before the law passed, spending an average of 18 percent more than their large competitors annually for health coverage and often seeing their insurance bills skyrocket if a single employee got sick. The result was that the number of small businesses in the United States offering coverage to employees was falling rapidly — from nearly 70 percent in 2000 to less than 60 percent of employers by 2009 — leaving millions of working families without coverage. Since the law passed, the share of small businesses offering employee coverage has held steady at 59 percent, the Kaiser Family Foundation has found, in part because new tax credits in the law are saving hundreds of thousands of small companies thousands of dollars each on their insurance costs. And independent experts such as Rand Corp. predict the number of employers offering coverage will rise in 2014 — just as it did in Massachusetts after health reform was passed — when small-business owners have the choice of shopping for health coverage in new competitive marketplaces.  A third false attack recycled in recent weeks is that the Affordable Care Act cuts Medicare benefits. In truth, Medicare is stronger than ever. Thanks to the law, seniors have new benefits such as free preventive care as well as discounts on brand-name medications in the “doughnut hole” coverage gap that have already saved more than 5 million people with Medicare about $600 each. Medicare Advantage premiums have fallen two years running. New crackdowns on fraud and abuse returned a record $5.4 billion to Medicare in 2010 and 2011. And the health-care law has strengthened Medicare’s long-term outlook, adding eight additional years to the projected solvency of the Medicare trust fund.  Those calling for repeal have yet to propose credible ideas for lowering health-care costs. In fact, the same House Republicans who are voting Wednesday to repeal these Medicare savings voted to keep them in their budget in March.  People are entitled to their opinions, but not to their own facts. And the facts in this case are clear: Since the Affordable Care Act was passed, national health spending is rising at a slower rate, health insurance premiums are rising at a slower rate, small-business coverage is holding steady and Medicare is on a stronger financial footing.  Now that the Supreme Court has issued a decision, the American people would be better served if Congress joined the president in working to build on that progress, not undo it.    Read more about this debate:    Fareed Zakaria: Curbing the cost of health care   Randy Barnett: We lost on health care. But the Constitution won.   E.J. Dionne Jr. A win for Obama — and Roberts   Charles Krauthammer: Why Roberts did it   Robert J. Samuelson: The folly of Obamacare          opinions   Orlando Shooting Updates News and analysis on the deadliest mass shooting in U.S. history. post_newsletter348 follow-orlando true after3th false          Please provide a valid email address.           Sign up      You’re all set!   See all newsletters      true     The story must be told. Your subscription supports journalism that matters.   Try 1 month for 99¢             Comments           Share on FacebookShare       Share on TwitterTweet     Share via Email                                Show Comments       Discussion Policy     Comments       SuperFan Badge SuperFan badge holders consistently post smart, timely comments about Washington area sports and teams. More about badges | Request a badge   Culture Connoisseur Badge Culture Connoisseurs consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on the arts, lifestyle and entertainment. More about badges | Request a badge   Fact Checker Badge Fact Checkers contribute questions, information and facts to The Fact Checker. More about badges | Request a badge   Washingtologist Badge Washingtologists consistently post thought-provoking, timely comments on events, communities, and trends in the Washington area. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Writer Badge This commenter is a Washington Post editor, reporter or producer.   Post Forum Badge Post Forum members consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on politics, national and international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Weather Watcher Badge Weather Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on climates and forecasts. More about badges | Request a badge   World Watcher Badge World Watchers consistently offer thought-provoking, timely comments on international affairs. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Contributor Badge This commenter is a Washington Post contributor. Post contributors aren’t staff, but may write articles or columns. In some cases, contributors are sources or experts quoted in a story. More about badges | Request a badge   Post Recommended Washington Post reporters or editors recommend this comment or reader post.   You must be logged in to report a comment. Sign in here   You must be logged in to recommend a comment. Sign in here   Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.All comments are posted in the All Comments tab. More about badgesGet a badge  To pause and restart automatic updates, click "Live" or "Paused". If paused, you'll be notified of the number of additional comments that have come in.    Comments our editors find particularly useful or relevant are displayed in Top Comments, as are comments by users with these badges: . Replies to those posts appear here, as well as posts by staff writers.          Spam Offensive Disagree Off-Topic        Among the criteria for featured comments: likes by users, replies by users, previous history of valuable commenting, and selection by moderators.                 Facebook  Twitter  Reddit     StumbleUpon  Digg                           Most Read        1    Opinion  Now that Trumpcare has failed, it’s time to drop all the lies       2    Opinion  This is what you get when you elect Republicans       3    Opinion  John Delaney: Why I’m running for president       4    Opinion  The worst is yet to come       5    Opinion  Scaramucci puts his convictions on the record, then backstabs the reporter who published them            The story must be told. Subscribe to The Washington Post.   Subscribe            Our Online Games    Play right from this page                    Mahjongg Dimensions  Strategy game              Mahjongg Candy  Strategy game              Word Wipe  Word game                   opinions       Success! Check your inbox for details.        Please enter a valid email address    You might also like:                 Sign Up No Thanks   See all newsletters        washingtonpost.com © 1996-2017 The Washington Post   Help and Contact Us Terms of Service Privacy Policy Print Products Terms of Sale Digital Products Terms of Sale Submissions and Discussion Policy RSS Terms of Service Ad Choices        Close video player   Now Playing                       Read content from allstate           Content from Allstate  This content is paid for by an advertiser and published by WP BrandStudio. The Washington Post newsroom was not involved in the creation of this content. Learn more about WP BrandStudio.   We went to the source. Here’s what matters to millennials. A state-by-state look at where Generation Y stands on the big issues.                                                     












































































Kathleen Sebelius Quotes - BrainyQuote



































 Authors:

A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M


N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z



 | 
Follow Us: 















Please enable Javascript
This site requires Javascript be enabled to provide you the best experience. Some features may not be available with
Javascript disabled!

 















The essence of good government is trust.


Kathleen Sebelius






 
 

 
 
 













Related Authors 


Benjamin Franklin


Alexander Hamilton


Hillary Clinton


Robert Kennedy


Barry Goldwater


Hubert H. Humphrey


Mitt Romney


Patrick Henry




Popular Topics 


Motivational Quotes


Inspirational Quotes


Life Quotes


Friendship Quotes


Love Quotes


Positive Quotes


Funny Quotes


Smile Quotes




More 



Find on Amazon:
Kathleen Sebelius

Cite this page


Language
Español
Français

About
About Us

Privacy

Terms





Kathleen Sebelius Quotes

American
-
Politician

Born: May 15, 1948










































   Loading...






The men and women who serve this great nation, whether they are stationed in Iraq, Fort Riley, or the Korean Peninsula, or they serve us at home as our community first responders, serve because they believe in America.
Kathleen Sebelius


Home,
Women,
Great



















The essence of good government is trust.
Kathleen Sebelius


Trust,
Good,
Government
























But for us Democrats, Obamacare is a badge of honor. Because no matter who you are, what stage of life you're in, this law is a good thing.
Kathleen Sebelius


Life,
Good,
Law



















More than five million seniors have already saved money on their prescription drugs, and almost 33 million have benefited from free preventive services. The president cracked down hard on Medicare and health care fraud, recovering a record-breaking $10.7 billion over the last three years, protecting our seniors. That's what change looks like.
Kathleen Sebelius


Change,
Money,
Health



















And under Obamacare, insurance companies can no longer discriminate against women. Before, some wouldn't cover women's most basic needs, like contraception and maternity care, but would still charge us up to 50 percent more than men - for a worse plan.
Kathleen Sebelius


Women,
Men,
Care



















Being a mother is no longer a liability, and being a woman is no longer a pre-existing condition!
Kathleen Sebelius


Mother,
Woman,
Being



















There's a digital revolution taking place both in and out of government in favor of open-sourced data, innovation, and collaboration.
Kathleen Sebelius


Innovation,
Collaboration



















While closing our innovation gaps won't solve all our problems, we have some very real opportunities to improve the quality of care that's delivered to millions of Americans.
Kathleen Sebelius


Innovation,
Quality



















What we've been finding is that when you remove the barriers to innovation, you can actually hold costs down while lifting entrepreneurs up and getting better health results.
Kathleen Sebelius


Health,
Innovation,
Better
























We've been finding that when you empower engineers, scientists, and coders, they respond by creating new tools to empower physicians, patients, and parents.
Kathleen Sebelius


Parents,
Tools,
Empower



















Global health issues remind us - perhaps more than any other issue - that we are all children of the same extended family.
Kathleen Sebelius


Family,
Health,
Children



















In many ways, human health is the great global connector.
Kathleen Sebelius


Health,
Great,
Human



















In this 21st century world, some of our country's most significant exports and imports extend beyond goods and services: They also include innovation, knowledge, discovery, and healing.
Kathleen Sebelius


Knowledge,
Innovation,
World



















I know how tough it is to stand up to powerful forces that prey on consumers.
Kathleen Sebelius


Powerful,
Know,
Tough



















Although black and white Americans live, work, and learn together now, there is still injustice in America.
Kathleen Sebelius


Work,
Black And White,
Black
























A healthy state encourages many voices - and lots of listening.
Kathleen Sebelius


Listening,
Healthy,
Voices



















But the dollars spent on economic incentives and new investment strategies are wasted unless we seriously address the two most important economic issues in Kansas: education and health care.
Kathleen Sebelius


Education,
Health,
Care



















But wishing our Kansas soldiers 'God speed' is not enough. We need to comfort, care for, and protect their families. And we should ease the financial burdens that these families often face.
Kathleen Sebelius


God,
Financial,
Care



















I believe we all agree that, for the health of Kansas, nothing is more important than education.
Kathleen Sebelius


Education,
Health,
Believe



















If your voices are not heard, you can be sure that many others will be - in particular those who are paid to present a point of view, and often do it most effectively.
Kathleen Sebelius


View,
You,
Present



















We have by far the most expensive health system in the world. We spend 50 percent more per person than the next most costly nation. Americans spend more on health care than housing or food.
Kathleen Sebelius


Food,
Health,
World



















General Motors spends more on health care than steel.
Kathleen Sebelius


Health,
Care,
More
























Insurance companies can no longer refuse to cover Americans with pre-existing conditions. That's what change looks like.
Kathleen Sebelius


Change,
Insurance,
Looks



















Being a mother is no longer a liability, and being a woman is no longer a pre-existing condition! That's what change looks like.
Kathleen Sebelius


Change,
Mother,
Woman



















From 1965 to 1967, my dad, Jack Gilligan, served in Congress and helped pass landmark laws like the Voting Rights Act.
Kathleen Sebelius


Dad,
Voting,
Rights



















I was governor of Kansas when Mitt Romney was governor of Massachusetts.
Kathleen Sebelius


Kansas,
Massachusetts


































Share this page: 






























Cite this Page:
Citation







Find on Amazon:
Kathleen Sebelius
















Related Authors



Benjamin Franklin




Alexander Hamilton




Hillary Clinton




Robert Kennedy




Barry Goldwater




Hubert H. Humphrey




Mitt Romney




Patrick Henry


































BrainyQuote Desktop
BrainyQuote Mobile













Site

Home
Authors
Topics
Quote Of The Day
Pictures
Top 100 Quotes
Professions
Birthdays




Social
BQ on Facebook
BQ on Twitter
BQ on Pinterest
BQ on Google+
BQ on Instagram


Shop
BrainyQuote Store




Apps
iPhone/iPad app

Quote Of The Day Feeds
Javascript and RSS feeds
WordPress plugin
Quote of the Day Email




About
About Us
Contact Us
Submit
Privacy
Terms









Copyright © 2001 - 2017 BrainyQuote



Language:
Español | Français













   Loading...


Load more quotes







Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Kathleen Sebelius - Wikipedia






















 






Kathleen Sebelius

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Kathleen Sebelius








21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services


In office
April 28, 2009 – June 9, 2014


President
Barack Obama


Deputy
Bill Corr


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt


Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


44th Governor of Kansas


In office
January 13, 2003 – April 28, 2009


Lieutenant
John Moore
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Bill Graves


Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


23rd Insurance Commissioner of Kansas


In office
January 9, 1995 – January 13, 2003


Governor
Bill Graves


Preceded by
Ronald Todd


Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger





Personal details


Born
Kathleen Gilligan
(1948-05-15) May 15, 1948 (age 69)
Cincinnati, Ohio, U.S.


Political party
Democratic


Spouse(s)
Gary Sebelius


Relatives
John J. Gilligan (Father)


Education
Trinity Washington University (BA)
University of Kansas, Lawrence (MPA)


Kathleen Sebelius (/sᵻˈbiːliəs/; née Gilligan; born May 15, 1948) is an American politician who served as the 21st United States Secretary of Health and Human Services from 2009[1] until 2014.[2] Previously, she was the 44th Governor of Kansas from 2003 to 2009, the second woman to hold that office. She is a member of the Democratic Party. Sebelius was the Democratic respondent to the 2008 State of the Union address[3] and is chair-emerita of the Democratic Governors Association (she was its first female chair).[4] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation as Secretary of Health and Human Services.[2] She is CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC.[5]



Contents


1 Early life and education
2 Early career
3 Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)

3.1 Tenure
3.2 Committee assignments


4 Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)
5 Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)

5.1 2002 election
5.2 First term
5.3 2006 re-election
5.4 Second term


6 U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)

6.1 Nomination
6.2 Affordable Care Act
6.3 Hatch Act concern
6.4 Resignation


7 Political positions

7.1 Abortion
7.2 Morning-after pill
7.3 Capital punishment
7.4 Drug importation
7.5 Education
7.6 Environment
7.7 Firearms
7.8 LGBT Issues


8 Subsequent career
9 Personal life
10 Electoral history
11 References
12 External links



Early life and education[edit]
Sebelius was born and raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, the daughter of Mary Kathryn (née Dixon) and John "Jack" Gilligan.[6][7] Her father is a former Democratic Ohio Governor and thus they became the first father/daughter governor duo in the United States after her election.[8] Following passage of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, she pointed out another father-daughter connection: her father had been in the House of Representatives when Medicare was originally passed in 1965.[9] Her family was Roman Catholic, and had Irish ancestry.[10][11]
She attended the Summit Country Day School in Cincinnati and graduated from Trinity Washington University in Washington, D.C. with a B.A. in political science. She later earned a master of public administration degree from the University of Kansas.[12] She moved to Kansas in 1974.
Early career[edit]
Sebelius served as executive director and chief lobbyist for the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association (now Kansas Association for Justice) from 1977 to 1986.
Kansas House of Representatives (1987–1995)[edit]
She was first elected to the Kansas House of Representatives in 1986. She won re-election in 1988, 1990, and 1992. She represented Topeka, Kansas.
Tenure[edit]
In the 1988 presidential election, she endorsed Gary Hart.[13]
In 1991, she ran to become House Majority Leader, but lost to State Representative Tom Sawyer of Wichita.[14][15]
She was strongly pro-choice.[16]
Committee assignments[edit]

Federal and State Affairs Committee (Chair)[17]

Kansas Insurance Commissioner (1995–2003)[edit]
In 1994 she left the House to run for state Insurance Commissioner and stunned political forecasters by winning – the first time a Democrat had won in more than 10 years.
She refused to take campaign contributions from the insurance industry and blocked the proposed merger of Blue Cross Blue Shield of Kansas, the state's largest health insurer, with an Indiana-based company. Sebelius's decision marked the first time the corporation had been rebuffed in its acquisition attempts.[18]
In 2001 Sebelius was named as one of Governing Magazine's Public Officials of the Year while she was serving as Kansas Insurance Commissioner.[19]
Governor of Kansas (2003–2009)[edit]




Kathleen Sebelius (second from left) with Mississippi Governor Haley Barbour (first left), United States Secretary of State Condoleezza Rice (center), Michigan Governor Jennifer Granholm (fourth), and Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue (right)


2002 election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2002
Sebelius defeated Republican Tim Shallenburger 53%-45%.[20]
First term[edit]
Throughout her first term, Sebelius built upon her popularity and in January 2006 was tied for 20th most popular governor in the country.[21]
During the 2004 election, Sebelius was named as a potential running mate for John Kerry.[22] In the aftermath of Kerry's defeat, some pundits named Sebelius as a potential candidate for the Democratic nomination for President in 2008.[23]
In November 2005, Time named Sebelius as one of the five best governors in America, praising her for eliminating a $1.1 billion debt she inherited, ferreting out waste in state government, and strongly supporting public education – all without raising taxes, although she proposed raising sales, property, and income taxes.[24] The article also praised her bipartisan approach to governing, a useful trait in a state where Republicans have usually controlled the Legislature.[25]
In February 2006, the White House Project named Sebelius one of its "8 in '08," a group of eight female politicians who could possibly run and/or be elected president in 2008.[26] She was also cited by The New York Times to be among the women most likely to become the first female President of the United States.[27]
In October 2006, the Cato Institute gave Sebelius the grade of "D" on their biennial fiscal policy report card, which measures the fiscal performance of U.S. governors based on spending and taxes. Her grade was influenced by the combination of proposed tax increases and expanded spending growth beyond population plus inflation.[28]
2006 re-election[edit]
Main article: Kansas gubernatorial election, 2006




Sebelius meets with FEMA workers in Kansas


On May 26, 2006, Sebelius formally announced her candidacy for re-election. Four days later, Mark Parkinson, former chair of the Kansas Republican Party, switched his party affiliation to Democrat; the following day Sebelius announced that Parkinson would be her running mate for Lieutenant Governor. Parkinson had previously served in the state House during 1991–1992 and the Senate during 1993–1997. Parkinson was viewed as a pro-business moderate who strongly supported public education. This was somewhat reminiscent of the fact that John Moore had also been a Republican, before switching just days prior to joining Sebelius as her running mate.[29]
She was challenged by Republican Kansas State Senator Jim Barnett. A September 1 Rasmussen poll showed Sebelius with an 11% lead over Barnett.[30] Other polls gave Sebelius as much as a 20% lead. As of 2004[update], 50% of Kansas voters were registered Republicans, compared to 27% as registered Democrats.[31] Sebelius, nevertheless, won re-election defeating him 57%-41%. Because of Kansas's term limits law, her second term as Governor was her last.
Second term[edit]
In February 2008, during Sebelius's second term in office, there was a report in the Wichita Eagle that the State of Kansas was suspending tax refunds and that, because of a lack of tax revenue, may not have been able to meet payroll for state employees.[32][33] Sebelius called for issuing certificates of indebtedness, moving funds from various state agency accounts into the general fund to alleviate the crisis. However, Republican leaders in the legislature did not agree with her certificate of indebtedness plan, saying the state would be unable to repay the certificates unless Sebelius issued allotments or signed a budget rescission bill that had been passed by the legislature but had not yet been delivered to her desk. The standoff ended when the budget arrived, and Sebelius agreed to sign it, although she line-item vetoed several cuts she felt were too large. The rescission bill reduced the budget by about $300 million. $7 million of the cuts came in the form of reduced educational funding.[34]




Sebelius speaks during the second day of the 2008 Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.


After Barack Obama's clinching of the nomination in June 2008, speculation that she would be a contender for the vice-presidential slot on the Democratic ticket continued.[35] The Washington Post listed her as the top prospect for the 2008 nomination.[36] James Carville and Bob Novak also mentioned Sebelius' name,[37][38] and Wesley Clark, also considered a potential running mate, publicly endorsed Sebelius, referring to her as "the next vice-president of the United States."[39] Speculation that the Vice Presidential nomination lay in her future was heightened by the fact that she was chosen by the Democratic Party's congressional leaders to give their party's official response to Republican President George W. Bush's 2008 State of the Union Address.[40] The next day, she endorsed Obama's campaign, one week before the Kansas caucus on Super Tuesday.[41] Obama won the caucus easily, with 74% support.[42]
Speculation on her Vice Presidential selection intensified when a report from political ad agency insider, Tribble Ad Agency, reported on its website that the Obama Campaign owned the domain name "ObamaSebelius.com" through the GoDaddy.com registration service.[43] However, just after midnight on August 23, it was reported by the Associated Press that Obama ultimately selected Joe Biden, the senior senator from Delaware, as his running mate.[44]
Sebelius was considered to be on the short list for nomination to a position in Obama's Cabinet,[45] but she officially withdrew her name from consideration on December 6, 2008.[46] Following Bill Richardson's withdrawal as Obama's nomination for Secretary of Commerce, there was media speculation that Sebelius would be chosen as the new nominee.[47][48][49][50] Through a spokesperson, Sebelius reiterated her earlier statement that she would not consider accepting a nomination to the Cabinet position.[51] Sebelius' name was again floated as a replacement for Tom Daschle, who withdrew as Obama's Secretary of Health and Human Services-designate over tax issues. The governor at first did not publicly comment on whether or not she would be interested in accepting the position.[52] On February 28, 2009, the British wire agency Reuters reported that Sebelius had accepted the president's offer to become Secretary of Health and Human Services and that she would be nominated on March 2.[53]
Following Senator Sam Brownback's announcement that he would not seek re-election to the Senate, and would instead run for Governor of Kansas in the 2010 elections, Sebelius was one of several people that media outlets speculated would run for the open United States Senate seat in 2010.[54][55] However, Sebelius declined to run and maintained her post in the Obama administration.[56]
Sebelius is a former chair of the Democratic Governors Association, a popular launchpad for those with national political ambitions.[57] She was the first female chair of the association (elected as such in 2006).[4]
U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services (2009–2014)[edit]




Sebelius accepting her nomination by President Barack Obama as Secretary of Health and Human Services.


Nomination[edit]
On February 28, 2009, it was reported that Sebelius had accepted Obama's nomination for the position of Secretary of Health and Human Services. On March 2, 2009, Obama officially announced Governor Sebelius as his nominee.[58] At Obama's announcement, Sebelius was accompanied by two Kansas Republicans, former U.S. Senator Bob Dole and current U.S. Senator Pat Roberts. Anti-abortion activists and senators were the primary opponents of Sebelius's nomination.[59]
During the background investigation process for this position, in March 2009 she admitted to "unintentional errors" in tax returns and paid nearly $8,000 in back taxes.[60][61] She took unduly large deductions in areas that included charitable contributions, the sale of a home, and business expenses.[62][63][64][65]




Sebelius at an HHS meeting in April 2009.


In answer to questions from the Senate Finance Committee during her April 2009 confirmation hearing, Sebelius stated she received $12,450 between 1994 and 2001 from physician George Tiller, one of only 3 late term abortion providers nationwide, who was later assassinated. The Associated Press, however, reported that from 2000 to 2002 Tiller gave at least $23,000 more to a political action committee Sebelius established to raise money for Democrats while she was serving as state insurance commissioner.[66]
Sebelius was confirmed by the United States Senate by a vote of 65–31 and sworn in on April 28, 2009, amidst an outbreak of swine flu in the United States, Mexico, and numerous other countries around the world. Lieutenant Governor Parkinson was sworn in as Governor of Kansas and served the remainder of Sebelius's term.[67][68][69][70][71]
Affordable Care Act[edit]




Sebelius and Todd Park, the White House's chief technology officer


Sebelius is a staunch advocate for the Affordable Care Act, also known as Obamacare. In response to website glitches, and failures, she said in October 2013, “You deserve better. I apologize. I’m accountable to you for fixing these problems and I’m committed to earning your confidence back by fixing the site."[72] Republicans called for her resignation in response to the website problems.[73][74] In the House, fifty-five members of the House called for her resignation, while U.S. Senators Ted Cruz, Lamar Alexander and Pat Roberts all called for her resignation.[73][74] In response to the calls to resign Sebelius said: “The majority of people calling for me to resign I would say are people who I don't work for, and who do not want this program to work in the first place."[73][74]
Sebelius came under criticism for her role in administering ObamaCare when she made comments at a Congressional hearing regarding funding. In the hearing, she was asked where a $12 billion pot of money was being allotted; Medicare or Obamacare. She responded that it was in fact going to both.[75]
In 2009 through 2011, Forbes named Sebelius the 57th, 23rd, and 13th most powerful woman in the world, respectively.[76][77][78]
Hatch Act concern[edit]
On September 13, 2012, the Office of Special Counsel charged Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius with violating the Hatch Act by making a political remark during an official government event. Sebelius's office reclassified the event from official to political and reimbursed the government's expenses.[79]
Resignation[edit]
On April 11, 2014, Sebelius announced her resignation from her position as Secretary of Health and Human Services, assumedly tentative upon the confirmation of her successor. Sylvia Mathews Burwell was nominated that same day as her successor.[80]
Political positions[edit]
Abortion[edit]
Sebelius is "staunchly pro-choice."[81] Her office stated that abortions declined 8.5% during her tenure as governor.[82] According to the Kansas Department of Health and Environment statistics, the number of induced abortions in Kansas declined by 1,568, or 12.6%, from 2001 to 2007, the year of the most recently available statistics.[83] Her administration attributes the decline to health care reforms that Sebelius initiated, including "adoption incentives, extended health services for pregnant women..., sex education and... a variety of support services for families."[84] Nationally, the number of abortions declined approximately 7.6% from 2000 to 2005, the year of the most recently available and reliable U.S. statistics.[85]
Sebelius has been endorsed by Planned Parenthood, which has raised funds on her behalf.[86] In 2003, 2005, 2006, and again in 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation that would have limited abortions in Kansas.
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius vetoed House Substitute for Senate Bill 389, titled the Comprehensive Abortion Reform Act by its sponsors. Proponents of the bill argued the legislation would strengthen late-term abortion laws and prevent so-called "coerced abortions," particularly with respect to minors. The Kansas City Star reported that HS SB 389 would have required the State of Kansas to collect patient diagnostic information providing detailed medical justification for late-term abortions, and would have also permitted litigants to sue abortion providers if they thought that a relative of theirs was planning a late-term abortion in violation of Kansas law.[87] Sebelius objected to the constitutionality, efficacy and morality of the proposed legislation. She wrote, "The United States Supreme Court decisions make clear that any law regulating abortion must contain exceptions for pregnancies which endanger the woman's life or health. However, SB 389 allows a variety of individuals to seek a court order preventing a woman from obtaining an abortion, even where it may be necessary to save her life. I am concerned that the bill is unconstitutional or even worse, endangers the lives of women." In addition, she expressed concern that the bill would "likely encourage extensive litigation" and that it "unnecessarily jeopardizes the privacy of Kansas women's confidential medical records."[84]
Sebelius is a member of the Catholic Church; however, in early March 2009, then-Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke, prefect for the Apostolic Signatura, the Holy See's highest court, declared that Sebelius should not approach the altar for Communion in the United States, saying that, "after pastoral admonition, she obstinately persists in serious sin".[88] Kansas City Archbishop Joseph Fred Naumann also asked that Sebelius no longer receive Holy Communion because of her position on abortion. Naumann criticized Sebelius for vetoing HS SB 389.[89] The action received mixed reviews in the Catholic press.[90][91][92]
Anti-abortion activists criticized Sebelius's HHS nomination because she had received donations to her campaign from George Tiller, the medical director of an abortion clinic in Wichita.[93][94] Not long after Sebelius was sworn in as HHS Secretary, on May 31, 2009, Tiller was shot through the eye and killed by Scott Roeder.[95]
Morning-after pill[edit]
Despite her pro-choice view, in December 2011, Sebelius overruled the FDA's recommendation on making the "morning-after pill" (Plan B One-Step) available over the counter for females under the age of 17.[96] President Obama said that the decision was Sebelius's, not his.[97]
Judge Edward R. Korman of the United States District Court for the Eastern District of New York struck down this restriction, calling it "frivolous" and "silly", and alleging that pure politics — not scientific evidence — was behind efforts by Kathleen Sebelius, the secretary of health and human services, to block easier distribution to young girls. The Obama administration, in response, lowered the age limit from 17 to 15 but decided to appeal this ruling to maintain the loosened restrictions, in a move that was widely criticized by advocates of reproductive rights.[98]
Capital punishment[edit]
Sebelius is an opponent of capital punishment.[99] During her first term, the Kansas capital punishment laws were declared unconstitutional by the Kansas Supreme Court. However, on appeal by Kansas's Attorney General Phill Kline, the ruling was again overturned and the current law reinstated by the United States Supreme Court.
Drug importation[edit]
As governor of Kansas, Sebelius adopted a state drug importation program in 2004 to help her constituents afford prescription medication.[100] The program, called I-saveRx, connected individuals with and helped them buy medication from licensed pharmacies in Canada, Ireland and the United Kingdom. The program later went on to include Australia and New Zealand.[101] Due to federal laws prohibiting personal drug importation under most circumstances, the FDA intercepted some prescription orders en route to Americans who participated in I-SaveRx; while in most cases prescription imports for personal use are not seized.
Education[edit]




Sebelius at Cool Springs Elementary School in Adelphi, Maryland.


Early in the term, Sebelius made education funding her top priority. Education funding reached a breaking point in the summer of 2005 when the Kansas Supreme Court ordered the Legislature to increase K–12 funding.[102] Sebelius offered one education funding plan early in her first term, which consisted of property, sales, and income tax increases, resulting in 2006 in the largest K–12 education funding increase in the history of the state. The three-year plan aimed to increase education funding by nearly $1 billion over three years, but did not give a funding source for the second and third years.
Environment[edit]
Sebelius chaired the Governors' Ethanol Coalition. In 2006 she requested that $200 million be allotted from the US government to support the Department of Energy Biomass and Biorefinery Systems Research and Development Program.[103] She pushed for more widespread recycling efforts across the state.[104] In addition, she vetoed bills authorizing the construction of coal-fired power plants on three separate occasions[105] saying in March 2008, "We know that greenhouse gases contribute to climate change. As an agricultural state, Kansas is particularly vulnerable. Therefore, reducing pollutants benefits our state not only in the short term — but also for generations of Kansans to come."[106] On June 2, 2008, Sebelius spoke at the American Wind Energy Association Conference, calling for greater federal support for wind energy and other renewable energy resources.[107]
As Health and Human Services Secretary, Sebelius will have a role in the development of regulations governing hydraulic fracturing. President Obama issued an executive order enabling the Center for Disease Control (CDC) to participate in an Interagency Working Group charged with helping to develop practical, economical state and federal public health and environmental standards related to natural gas production.[108]
Firearms[edit]




Sebelius and Eric Holder


Sebelius has said she supports Kansans' right to own firearms, but does not believe a broad concealed carry law would make them safer: "I don't believe allowing people to carry concealed handguns into sporting events, shopping malls, grocery stores, or the workplace would be good public policy. And to me the likelihood of exposing children to loaded handguns in their parents' purses, pockets and automobiles is simply unacceptable."[109]
Sebelius vetoed, like her Republican predecessor Bill Graves, a concealed-carry law that would have allowed citizens to carry concealed weapons after obtaining a state permit and passing an FBI background check.[110] The veto left Kansas, at the time, as one of four states without any form of a conceal-carry law.
On March 21, 2006, she vetoed Senate Bill 418, a similar concealed-carry bill. On March 25, her veto was overturned after the Kansas House of Representatives voted 91–33 to override it. This followed the Kansas Senate's 30-10 override vote, which occurred the day after her veto.[111]
On April 21, 2008, Sebelius signed Senate Bill 46 into law, which repealed a 1933 state law prohibiting civilian ownership of machine guns and other firearms restricted by the National Firearms Act of 1934, specifically permitting ownership by civilians successfully meeting the requirements of the NFA. The law was passed in part to address legal issues that could have prevented dealers from delivering firearms to law enforcement agencies in Kansas. The law took effect on July 1, 2008.[112]
LGBT Issues[edit]
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewing it as sufficient,[113] and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 70% voter approval.
Subsequent career[edit]
After leaving the cabinet, Sebelius founded and became CEO of Sebelius Resources LLC, which provides strategic advice to private companies, non-profit organizations, higher education institutions, and financial investors.
Sebelius serves as a member of the boards of directors of companies including Dermira Inc., Grand Rounds, Inc., and Humacyte Inc., and of the Estee Lauder Foundation and the Kaiser Family Foundation. She serves on advisory boards for the Dole Institute of Politics and Solera Health. Sebelius is a senior advisor to Out Leadership and the Aspen Institute, where she co-chairs the Aspen Health Strategy Group. Sebelius is a frequent keynote speaker for national and international organizations.[114]
Personal life[edit]
Her husband, K. Gary Sebelius,[115] is a federal magistrate judge and the son of former U.S. Representative Keith Sebelius, a Republican. They have two sons: Ned (b. 1982) and John (b. 1985).[116] She also visits her childhood and current vacation home, located in Leland, Michigan, north of Traverse City, Michigan.
An avid fan of jazz music, Sebelius has a 30-year streak of annually attending Jazz Fest in New Orleans as of 2009. Only missing festivals two years in that period, because she was 9 months pregnant at the time.[117][118] She had also challenged President Obama to a rap battle sometime in 2016-2017, which the president declined.
Electoral history[edit]

Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2002

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius
435,462
52.9




Republican
Tim Shallenburger
371,325
45.3




Kansas Gubernatorial Election 2006

Party
Candidate
Votes
%
±



Democratic
Kathleen Sebelius (Incumbent)
480,532
57.8
+4.9



Republican
Jim Barnett
336,583
40.5



References[edit]



^ "Kathleen Sebelius Confirmed as Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services". Archived from the original on 2010-05-30. Retrieved 2010-05-30. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). hhs.gov
^ a b "HHS Secretary Kathleen Sebelius to resign | The Rundown | PBS NewsHour". Pbs.org. 2013-02-20. Retrieved 2014-06-30. 
^ "Response to the 2008 State of the Union address". CNN. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ a b "Sebelius Elected Chair of Democratic Governors Association; Kansas Governor Becomes First Woman to Lead DGA - 13 WTHR Indianapolis". Wthr.com. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved 2015-03-05. 
^ "Sebelius Resources LLC". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Ancestry of Kathleen Sebelius". wargs.com. 
^ "Beacon Journal: Search Results". October 12, 1996. 
^ "Meet Kathleen". Retrieved June 1, 2016. 
^ MSNBC's "Morning Joe" program, March 22, 2010
^ "Sebelius's Family". The Irish Times. 
^ "Transcript: Kathleen Sebelius". POLITICO. 
^ "Kathleen Sebelius - Forbes". Forbes. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". May 9, 1987. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". July 20, 1991. 
^ "Wichita Eagle: Search Results". January 23, 1992. 
^ "Daily Union - Google News Archive Search". google.com. 
^ "Political Women Go Hunting". National Wild Turkey Federation. October 27, 2004. 
^ Gurwitt, Rob (November 2001). "Kathleen Sebelius: Believer in Balance". Governing Magazine. 
^ "State Races: Kansas". CNN. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ SurveyUSA (2006). Governor Approval Ratings 01/06 Sort by State. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ CNN (2004). John Kerry campaign: Democratic candidates for vice president. Retrieved April 25, 2006. See also CNN (2004). WHO WILL JOHN KERRY PICK AS HIS RUNNING MATE?. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ "The 2008 Veepstakes". 
^ http://legislature.cjonline.com/stories/011304/leg_stateofstate.shtml. Retrieved June 1, 2016.  Missing or empty |title= (help)[dead link]
^ Time (2006). America's 5 Best Governors: Kathleen Sebelius |Kansas. Retrieved April 25, 2006.
^ The White House Project (2006). [1] Retrieved March 19, 2008.
^ Zernike, Kate (May 18, 2008). "She Just Might Be President Someday". New York Times. 
^ "Fiscal Policy Report Card on America’s Governors: 2006" (PDF). Cato Institute. p. 23. 
^ Twitty, David (May 31, 2006). "Kan. gov. selects running mate for race". Seattle Post-Intelligencer. Associated Press. 
^ "Kansas Governor: Sebelius Lead Narrows". Archived from the original on 2008-12-01. Retrieved 2008-12-01. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Rasmussen Reports. September 1, 2006
^ Election 2004. Cnn.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Hanna, John (February 16, 2009). "Kan. suspends income tax refunds, may miss payroll". Wichita Eagle. Archived from the original on February 17, 2009. 
^ Smith, Ben (February 16, 2009). "Gibbs on Sebelius". Politico.com. 
^ Waggener, Kristen (February 25, 2009). "USD 416 faces state cuts of $33 per student". Louisburg Herald. 
^ Zerger Nathan, Jesse (24 April 2006). "Will Kansas Governor Be Dems VP Candidate in 2008?". BeyondChron. 
^ Cillizza, Chris and Shailagh Murray."So, Candidates, Who's It Going to Be?", Washington Post, May 11, 2008.
^ "Political Ticker", CNN, May 13, 2008.
^ A Vice President For Abortion. Rasmussenreports.com (2008-05-26). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius Obama's VP? – Political Machine. News.aol.com (2008-06-03). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Carpenter, Tim. "Sebelius to give response to State of the Union, Governor represents Democratic Party in opposition speech", Topeka Capital-Journal, January 16, 2008.
^ "Kansas Gov. Sebelius Endorses Obama, Governor Represents GOP-Friendly State Where Candidate Has Family Ties". =Associated Press. CBS News. January 29, 2008. Retrieved May 14, 2008. 
^ [2][dead link]
^ "Barack Obama chooses Kathleen Sebelius for Vice President", Tribble Ad Agency, August 18, 2008.
^ "Obama introduces Biden as running mate". CNN. August 23, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius Cabinet chances abound". Topeka Capital-Journal. November 21, 2008. 
^ Carpenter, Tim "Governor takes herself out of contention for cabinet post", Topeka Capital-Journal, December 7, 2008
^ "Richardson Pick Proves Hitch For Obama: Kathleen Sebelius On Short List To Replace N.M. Gov. For Commerce Post". CBS News. January 5, 2008. 
^ Charles, Deborah (January 5, 2009). "Obama transition hits bump as Richardson withdraws". Reuters. International Herald Tribune. 
^ Erbe, Bonnie (January 5, 2009). "Barack Obama Should Replace Bill Richardson in Cabinet With Kathleen Sebelius". U.S. News & World Report. 
^ Kraske, Steve (January 5, 2009). "With Richardson out, could Washington tempt Sebelius again?". Kansas City Star. 
^ "Sebelius not interested in commerce secretary". Kansas City Star. January 5, 2009. 
^ Steve Kraske"Sebelius back on radar for Cabinet post". Archived from the original on 2009-02-08. Retrieved 2009-02-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. Feb. 4, 2009
^ Obama picks Sebelius as health secretary. Reuters.com. Feb 28, 2009. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Second GOP senator to announce retirement". CNN.com Political Ticker. December 17, 2008. 
^ Silver, Nate (February 8, 2009). "Senate Rankings, February 2009 Edition". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Quinn, Sean (February 19, 2009). "Conflicting Reports on Sebelius to HHS; Still a Strong Frontrunner". FiveThirtyEight.com. 
^ Kan. governor draws national attention, by John Hanna, Associated Press. Retrieved January 28, 2007
^ Obama Taps Kansas Gov. Sebelius as Health Secretary. Foxnews.com (2010-04-07). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ "Abortion, not resume, could dominate Sebelius confirmation - CNN.com". CNN. March 2, 2009. Retrieved May 7, 2010. 
^ "Sebelius admits errors, pays $7,000 in back taxes". Archived from the original on 2009-04-03. Retrieved 2009-04-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). Yahoo News (2009-03-31)
^ O'Callaghan, John (March 31, 2009). "Health nominee Sebelius reveals tax errors". Reuters. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Levey, Noam (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius and taxes: Health Secretary-designate Kathleen Sebelius, latest pick for President Barack Obama's Cabinet, to reveal tax problems". Chicago Tribune. Retrieved April 1, 2009. 
^ Pear, Robert (March 31, 2009). "Sebelius Pays Back Taxes". New York Times. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Rubenstein, Sarah (April 1, 2009). "Sebelius Runs Into Tax Problems, But Daschle’s Were Bigger .". Wall Street Journal. Retrieved 2009-04-02. 
^ Goldstein, David (April 1, 2009). "Add Sebelius to list of Obama Cabinet picks with tax troubles". McClatchy. Retrieved Aug 27, 2013. 
^ "Sebelius lowballed donations from abortion doc". MSNBC. April 14, 2009. Retrieved 2009-04-14. 
^ Goldstein, David; Klepper, David (2009-04-28). "Sebelius sworn in to Cabinet, Parkinson becomes Kansas governor". The Kansas City Star. Archived from the original on 2009-04-30. Retrieved 2009-04-29. 
^ Sebelius wins panel approval as health secretary. MSNBC (2009-04-21). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Sebelius approved as HHS secretary. Cbsnews.com (2009-04-29). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Montopoli, Brian (April 28, 2009). "Health Secretary Sebelius Confirmed By Senate". CBS News. 
^ "U.S. Senate: Roll Call Vote". senate.gov. 27 January 2015. 
^ "Sebelius: 'Hold me accountable'". POLITICO. 
^ a b c Camia, Catalina (October 29, 2013). "Sen. Alexander calls on Sebelius to resign". USA Today. Retrieved 31 October 2013. As the top official overseeing the implementation of the troubled HealthCare.gov website testified before a House committee, Sen. Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., on Tuesday called for Sebelius to step down. 
^ a b c "Sebelius says she doesn't 'work for' those calling for her resignation". FOXNews.com. October 24, 2013. Retrieved 31 October 2013. 
^ "Shimkus Questions Sebelius on Budget Gimmicks in the Health Care Law". YouTube. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women of 2009". Forbes.com. August 19, 2009. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2010". Forbes.com. 
^ "The 100 Most Powerful Women 0f 2011". Forbes.com. 
^ "Special counsel cites Sebelius for Hatch Act violation". cnn.com. 
^ Eilperin/Goldstein, Juliet/Amy. "Kathleen Sebelius steps down as HHS secretary; OMB director will take her place". Washington Post. Retrieved 17 May 2014. 
^ Carney, Timothy (2011-04-10) Democrats will yield on everything but abortion, Washington Examiner
^ Cillizza, Chris (June 5, 2008). "Novak Takes A Swipe At Possible Obama VP Pick". Washington Post. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ "Abortions in Kansas: Preliminary Reports". Office of Health Assessment, Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Kansas Department of Health and Environment. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ a b Corcoran, Nicole (April 21, 2008). "Veto Message for House Substitute for Senate Bill 389". Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Office of the Governor, State of Kansas. Archived from the original on May 17, 2008. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Wind, Rebecca (January 17, 2008). "U.S. Abortion Rate Continues Long-Term Decline, Falling to Lowest Level Since 1974; More Effort Still Needed to Reduce Unintended Pregnancy". Guttmacher Institute Media Center. Guttmacher Institute. Retrieved 2008-06-10. 
^ Novak, Robert (May 26, 2008). "A Vice President for Abortion". Chicago Sun-Times. Sun-Times News Group. Retrieved 2008-05-26. 
^ Sullinger, Jim (May 30, 2008). "Kansas Senate fails to override veto of abortion law File:Kathleen Sebelius in HHS meeting 4-28-09.jpg". The Kansas City Star. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [dead link]
^ Duin, Julia (March 24, 2009). "Sebelius in trouble with Catholic Church". The Washington Times. The Washington Times. Retrieved September 9, 2009. 
^ Sadowski, Dennis (May 12, 2008). "Archbishop Naumann: Kansas governor should stop receiving Communion". Catholic News Service. U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops. Retrieved 2008-06-11. [Naumann] said many Kansans "find it more than an embarrassment" that the state had become "infamous for being the late-term abortion center for the Midwest." 
^ "Rigid bishops one-up the popes". National Catholic Reporter. May 30, 2008. Archived from the original on January 28, 2012. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ Whelon, Patrick (May 14, 2008). "Conservatives gear up again to use Communion as a political weapon, no matter the cost to American Catholicism". Catholic Democrats. Retrieved 2008-06-11. 
^ "Archbishop asks Kansas governor to refrain from Communion for abortion support, awaits response". Catholic News Agency. May 12, 2008. Retrieved 2009-03-01. 
^ Dave Helling"Buzz over possible Cabinet post for Sebelius has ignited a firestorm around her". Archived from the original on 2009-02-24. Retrieved 2009-03-03. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . The Kansas City Star. February 20, 2009
^ "Bill O'Reilly called George Tiller". @politifact. 
^ "Abortion Doctor Gunned Down at Kansas Church, Suspect in Custody". Fox News. 
^ Plan to Widen Availability of Morning-After Pill Is Rejected By GARDINER HARRIS, New York Times, December 7, 2011
^ Obama defends Plan B decision 'as father of two daughters' By David Jackson, USA TODAY Dec. 8, 2011
^ Shear, Michael D. (1 May 2013). "U.S. to Defend Age Limits on Morning-After Pill Sales". New York Times. Retrieved 11 May 2013. 
^ Sack, Kevin. "Kathleen Sebelius Biography". New York Times. Retrieved 2008-07-14. 
^ "Full text of Gov. Kathleen Sebelius' news release". cjonline.com. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ "Australia and New Zealand Added to I-SaveRx Suppliers". ihealthbeat.org. Retrieved 2013-08-21. 
^ Passions cool as session looms – Few legislators say they'd defy court Kansas City Star June 20, 2005 retrieved June 5, 2008
^ "TESTIMONY OF KATHLEEN SEBELIUS BEFORE THE HOUSE ENERGY AND WATER DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS SUBCOMMITTEE IN SUPPORT OF FY’07 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY FUNDING FOR BIOFUELS". Archived from the original on 2007-07-06. Retrieved 2007-07-06. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link). March 28, 2006
^ "State Agency 'Green Teams' Focus on Recycling and Waste Reduction". WBIW. March 4, 2008. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes coal plant bill". Kansas City Star. May 16, 2008. 
^ Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants. Ens-newswire.com. Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ LJWorld.com / Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy. .ljworld.com (2008-06-02). Retrieved on 2012-02-11.
^ Staff (30 November 2012). "Lawmakers fear Kathleen Sebelius taking aim at natural gas boom". Beltway Confidential. The Examiner. Retrieved 1 December 2012. 
^ "Sebelius vetoes concealed carry bill". Associated Press. April 16, 2004. 
^ USA Today (2005). Kansas governor vetoes concealed weapons bill. Retrieved June 14, 2007.
^ Kansas Attorney General Phill Kline (2006)."Kansas Concealed Weapon". Archived from the original on 2006-06-02. Retrieved 2006-04-25. CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) . Retrieved June 2, 2006.
^ "Sebelius signs machine gun bill". Associated Press. April 22, 2008. 
^ Hanna, John (April 6, 2008). "Sebelius on gay marriage". Boston Globe. Retrieved 2005-06-05. 
^ "Bio". Sebelius Resources LLC. 
^ "Magistrate Judge K. Gary Sebelius". U.S. District Court, District of Kansas. U.S. Government. Retrieved 2008-05-02. 
^ Kathleen Sebelius. Notable Names Database
^ Keith Spera. "Cabinet nominee Kathleen Sebelius grooved at Jazz Fest on Sunday (Just don't tell anyone her confirmation hearing is today.)" in Times-Picayune (New Orleans), 2009 April 28, Saint Tammany Edition, pp. A1, A7.
^ "An Obamacare Architect Speaks Out" Slate's The Gist, February 7, 2017.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Kathleen Sebelius.



Biography at the United States Department of Health and Human Services
Biography at Sebelius Resources LLC
Works by or about Kathleen Sebelius in libraries (WorldCat catalog)


Articles


Trinity Washington University (2006). Profile: Kathleen Sebelius '70. Retrieved June 15, 2008.



Political offices


Preceded by
Ronald Todd
Insurance Commissioner of Kansas
1995–2003
Succeeded by
Sandy Praeger


Preceded by
Bill Graves
Governor of Kansas
2003–2009
Succeeded by
Mark Parkinson


Preceded by
Mike Leavitt
United States Secretary of Health and Human Services
2009–2014
Succeeded by
Sylvia Mathews Burwell


Party political offices


Preceded by
Tom Sawyer
Democratic nominee for Governor of Kansas
2002, 2006
Succeeded by
Tom Holland


Preceded by
Bill Richardson
Chair of Democratic Governors Association
2006–2007
Succeeded by
Brian Schweitzer


Preceded by
Jim Webb
Response to the State of the Union address
2008
Succeeded by
Bobby Jindal








v
t
e


Governors of Kansas



Territorial (1854–61)



Reeder
Shannon
Geary
Walker
Denver
Medary








State (since 1861)



Robinson
Carney
Crawford
Green
Harvey
Osborn
Anthony
St. John
Glick
Martin
Humphrey
Lewelling
Morrill
Leedy
Stanley
Bailey
Hoch
Stubbs
Hodges
Capper
Allen
Davis
Paulen
Reed
Woodring
Landon
Huxman
Ratner
Schoeppel
Carlson
Hagaman
Arn
Hall
McCuish
G. Docking
Anderson
Avery
R. Docking
Bennett
Carlin
Hayden
Finney
Graves
Sebelius
Parkinson
Brownback












v
t
e


United States Secretaries of Health and Human Services



Secretaries of Heath,
Education, and Welfare



Hobby
Folsom
Flemming
Ribicoff
Celebrezze
Gardner
Cohen
Finch
Richardson
Weinberger
Mathews
Califano
Harris









Secretaries of Health
and Human Services



Harris
Schweiker
Heckler
Bowen
Sullivan
Shalala
Thompson
Leavitt
Sebelius
Burwell
Price












v
t
e


Cabinet of President Barack Obama (2009–2017)








Cabinet



Secretary of State



Hillary Clinton (2009–2013)
John Kerry (2013–2017)








Secretary of the Treasury



Timothy Geithner (2009–2013)
Jack Lew (2013–2017)





Secretary of Defense



Robert Gates (2009–2011)
Leon Panetta (2011–2013)
Chuck Hagel (2013–2015)
Ash Carter (2015–2017)





Attorney General



Eric Holder (2009–2015)
Loretta Lynch (2015–2017)





Secretary of the Interior



Ken Salazar (2009–2013)
Sally Jewell (2013–2017)





Secretary of Agriculture



Tom Vilsack (2009–2017)





Secretary of Commerce



Gary Locke (2009–2011)
John Bryson (2011–2012)
Penny Pritzker (2013–2017)





Secretary of Labor



Hilda Solis (2009–2013)
Thomas Perez (2013–2017)





Secretary of Health and Human Services



Kathleen Sebelius (2009–2014)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2014–2017)





Secretary of Housing and Urban Development



Shaun Donovan (2009–2014)
Julian Castro (2014–2017)





Secretary of Transportation



Ray LaHood (2009–2013)
Anthony Foxx (2013–2017)





Secretary of Energy



Steven Chu (2009–2013)
Ernest Moniz (2013–2017)





Secretary of Education



Arne Duncan (2009–2016)
John King (2016–2017)





Secretary of Veterans Affairs



Eric Shinseki (2009–2014)
Robert McDonald (2014–2017)





Secretary of Homeland Security



Janet Napolitano (2009–2013)
Jeh Johnson (2013–2017)













Cabinet-level



Vice President



Joe Biden (2009–2017)








White House Chief of Staff



Rahm Emanuel (2009–2010)
William Daley (2011–2012)
Jack Lew (2012–2013)
Denis McDonough (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agency



Lisa Jackson (2009–2013)
Gina McCarthy (2013–2017)





Director of the Office of Management and Budget



Peter Orszag (2009–2010)
Jack Lew (2010–2012)
Sylvia Mathews Burwell (2013–2014)
Shaun Donovan (2014–2017)





Trade Representative



Ron Kirk (2009–2013)
Michael Froman (2013–2017)





Ambassador to the United Nations



Susan Rice (2009–2013)
Samantha Power (2013–2017)





Chair of the Council of Economic Advisers



Christina Romer (2009–2010)
Austan Goolsbee (2010–2011)
Alan Krueger (2011–2013)
Jason Furman (2013–2017)





Administrator of the Small Business Administration



Karen Mills (2012–2013)**
Maria Contreras-Sweet (2014–2017)









* Acting
** took office in 2009, raised to cabinet-rank in 2012
See also: Confirmations of Barack Obama's Cabinet








Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 9527260
LCCN: no2003018093
IATH: w6t7351b










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=789859326"					
Categories: 1948 births21st-century American politicians21st-century women politiciansAmerican people of Irish descentAmerican Roman CatholicsDemocratic Party state governors of the United StatesGovernors of KansasKansas DemocratsKansas Insurance CommissionersLiving peopleMembers of the Kansas House of RepresentativesObama administration cabinet membersPeople from Leland, MichiganPoliticians from CincinnatiPoliticians from Topeka, KansasTrinity Washington University alumniUnited States Secretaries of Health and Human ServicesUniversity of Kansas alumniWomen members of the Cabinet of the United StatesWomen state governors of the United StatesWomen state legislators in KansasHidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknownPages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsAll articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from June 2016Articles with dead external links from March 2015Articles containing potentially dated statements from 2004All articles containing potentially dated statementsWikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikisource 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어Bahasa IndonesiaItalianoעברית日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaTürkçeУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 10 July 2017, at 02:34.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






















Kathleen Sebelius (@Sebelius) | Twitter



























Skip to content









Home
Home
Home, current page.






Moments
Moments
Moments, current page.






Search query



Search Twitter









Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @




















Language: English 



 



Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
English UK
Español
Filipino
Français
Hrvatski
Italiano
Magyar
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português
Română
Slovenčina
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
Ελληνικά
Български език
Русский
Српски
Українська мова
עִבְרִית
العربية
فارسی
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
ಕನ್ನಡ
ภาษาไทย
한국어
日本語
简体中文
繁體中文




 








Have an account?  Log in


   

Have an account?










Remember me

·
Forgot password?











New to Twitter?
Sign up
                











































      Kathleen Sebelius



@Sebelius












Tweets
Tweets, current page.
32
            



Following
Following
82



Followers
Followers
425

 
 
More 













Unmute @Sebelius

Mute @Sebelius



Follow


    Following
  

    Unfollow
  

    Blocked
  

    Unblock
  

    Pending
  

    Cancel
  






















Kathleen Sebelius



@Sebelius


Former public official at state and national level; strategic consultant on health care; speaker; wife, mother, and grandmother



Washington, DC









Joined June 2014












                
                0 Photos and videos
            

            Photos and videos
          



















Tweets


Tweets
Tweets, current page.



                  Tweets & replies
                





You blocked @Sebelius
Are you sure you want to view these Tweets? Viewing Tweets won't unblock @Sebelius
Yes, view profile






Close




            
            Kathleen Sebelius followed
        






















Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







gwen ifill‏Verified account @gwenifill

6 Aug 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Jon Stewart dancing with his kids to Springsteen. #priceless





3 replies




65 retweets




184 likes








Reply


3







Retweet


65




Retweeted


65








Like


184





Liked


184










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

30 Jul 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







#medicare#Medicaid turn 50 today. Millions of Americans live longer, healthier lives. #keepingushealthy





4 replies




6 retweets




6 likes








Reply


4







Retweet


6




Retweeted


6








Like


6





Liked


6










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







HHS.gov‏Verified account @HHSGov

29 Jul 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







“No longer will illness crush and destroy savings” - LBJ on signing #Medicare into law 50 years ago. #KeepingUSHealthy





8 replies




78 retweets




35 likes








Reply


8







Retweet


78




Retweeted


78








Like


35





Liked


35










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

7 Jul 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Congrats @lindouglass; great addition to @BBGMedia





0 replies




0 retweets




2 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like


2





Liked


2










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

27 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







#AspenIdeas launched Strategic Health Group with co-chairs Thompson and @Sebelius. First topic is end of life.#Spotlight Health





1 reply




1 retweet




5 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


5





Liked


5










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







HHSHealth‏Verified account @HHS_Health

27 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







@KBDeSalvo @WalterIsaacson discuss #health in #neworleans 10yrs after Hurricane Katrina @aspenideas #SpotlightHealthpic.twitter.com/K2fUUXKIP6
















0 replies




14 retweets




15 likes








Reply










Retweet


14




Retweeted


14








Like


15





Liked


15










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

27 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Just finished a panel with 4 other HHS secretaries @aspenIdeas.





2 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply


2







Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

26 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







You can check out our Session at #SpotlightHealth
https://YouTube.be/vid-El8z4aQ  @AspenIdeas





0 replies




8 retweets




4 likes








Reply










Retweet


8




Retweeted


8








Like


4





Liked


4










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

26 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Today we can say in no uncertain terms that we've made our union a little more perfect." —President Obama #LoveWins” #DefendLoveForAll





1 reply




2 retweets




2 likes








Reply


1







Retweet


2




Retweeted


2








Like


2





Liked


2










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







HuffPost‏Verified account @HuffPost

26 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







The White House Facebook profile pic in honor of legalizing gay marriage http://huff.to/1BH7u0W pic.twitter.com/XO5DYCYhs1
















46 replies




2,851 retweets




2,937 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







John Sebelius‏ @johnsebelius

26 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Today was a good day. #DefendLoveForAll https://instagram.com/p/4ZVyuHOtvE/ 





0 replies




1 retweet




0 likes








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

26 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Latest Hits of Supremes about to start now@AspenIdeas #Spotlight health





0 replies




0 retweets




0 likes








Reply










Retweet







Retweeted











Like








Liked













Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo













Kathleen Sebelius‏ @Sebelius

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Just arrived in Aspen for Spotlight Health meetings. Will do panel in am on SCOTUS decision. Eager for conversation about future.





0 replies




1 retweet




1 like








Reply










Retweet


1




Retweeted


1








Like


1





Liked


1










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







Sylvia Burwell‏Verified account @SecBurwell

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







Today’s decision is about 6M+ individuals who will sleep easier knowing they will still be able to afford health coverage. #ACAisWorking





9 replies




92 retweets




72 likes








Reply


9







Retweet


92




Retweeted


92








Like


72





Liked


72










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







White House Archived‏Verified account @ObamaWhiteHouse

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







"If you’re a woman, you can’t be charged more than anybody else" —@POTUS: http://go.wh.gov/ACADecision  #ACAWorkspic.twitter.com/ViTDcexkJI
















40 replies




372 retweets




534 likes








Reply


40







Retweet


372




Retweeted


372








Like


534





Liked


534










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







Senator Harry Reid‏Verified account @SenatorReid

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







ACA would not be the law today if not for my dear friend @NancyPelosi. We worked so hard on that together.pic.twitter.com/OIWpQZZpQc
















150 replies




347 retweets




607 likes








Reply


150







Retweet


347




Retweeted


347








Like


607





Liked


607










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







Donna Brazile‏Verified account @donnabrazile

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







What a great victory for the #ACA. No American should be denied access to health care. #OBAMACARE forever.





29 replies




222 retweets




256 likes








Reply


29







Retweet


222




Retweeted


222








Like


256





Liked


256










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







The Democrats‏Verified account @TheDemocrats

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







"America would have gone backwards. That's not what we do. That's not what America does. We go forwards." -@POTUS #ACAHereToStay





8 replies




87 retweets




98 likes








Reply


8







Retweet


87




Retweeted


87








Like


98





Liked


98










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







Valerie Jarrett‏Verified account @vj44

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







"This was a good day for America. Let's get back to work." - @POTUS on the #ACApic.twitter.com/aaa8WHxZFj
















11 replies




70 retweets




73 likes








Reply


11







Retweet


70




Retweeted


70








Like


73





Liked


73










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo










Kathleen Sebelius Retweeted
            







White House Archived‏Verified account @ObamaWhiteHouse

25 Jun 2015






More









Copy link to Tweet


Embed Tweet







It's a good day for America. http://go.wh.gov/ACADecision  #ACAWorkspic.twitter.com/aEzPDhng94























97 replies




684 retweets




901 likes








Reply


97







Retweet


684




Retweeted


684








Like


901





Liked


901










Thanks. Twitter will use this to make your timeline better. Undo












          @Sebelius hasn't Tweeted yet.
      
Back to top ↑












Loading seems to be taking a while.

      Twitter may be over capacity or experiencing a momentary hiccup. Try again or visit Twitter Status for more information.
    

















      New to Twitter?
    


    Sign up now to get your own personalized timeline!
  

Sign up




You may also like
    ·
    Refresh








false












© 2017 Twitter
About
Help Center
Terms
Privacy policy
Cookies
Ads info




















Close




            
            Choose a trend location
          






















Dismiss











Close







            Previous
          







            Next
          













Close



Go to a person's profile












Saved searches


Remove














In this conversation



Verified accountProtected Tweets @











    Suggested users
  







Verified accountProtected Tweets @












Verified accountProtected Tweets @


























Close



Promote this Tweet

















Close



Block






Cancel
Block












Add a location to your Tweets

        When you tweet with a location, Twitter stores that location. 
        You can switch location on/off before each Tweet and always have the option to delete your location history.
        Learn more


Turn location on
Not now


























Close



Share Location















Results from 



Send









Close



Your lists













Close



Create a new list




List name




Description

Under 100 characters, optional



Privacy



Public · Anyone can follow this list
      


Private · Only you can access this list
      




Save list











Close
























Close



Copy link to Tweet




Here's the URL for this Tweet. Copy it to easily share with friends.












Close



Embed this Tweet
Embed this Video



Add this Tweet to your website by copying the code below. Learn more
Add this video to your website by copying the code below. Learn more




Hmm, there was a problem reaching the server. Try again?






            Include parent Tweet
          




            Include media
          




By embedding Twitter content in your website or app, you are agreeing to the Twitter Developer Agreement and Developer Policy.
Preview












Close



Why you're seeing this ad
















Close



Log in to Twitter
















Remember me

·
Forgot password?












        Don't have an account? Sign up »









Close



Sign up for Twitter





Not on Twitter? Sign up, tune into the things you care about, and get updates as they happen.


Sign up




        Have an account? Log in »









Close



Two-way (sending and receiving) short codes:





Country
Code
For customers of




United States
40404
(any)


Canada
21212
(any)


United Kingdom
86444
Vodafone, Orange, 3, O2


Brazil
40404
Nextel, TIM


Haiti
40404
Digicel, Voila


Ireland
51210
Vodafone, O2


India
53000
Bharti Airtel, Videocon, Reliance


Indonesia
89887
AXIS, 3, Telkomsel, Indosat, XL Axiata


Italy
4880804
Wind


3424486444
Vodafone





        » See SMS short codes for other countries













Close



Confirmation



















Close



 
















Close














            Skip all
          




    Welcome home!
  
This timeline is where you’ll spend most of your time, getting instant updates about what matters to you.




    Tweets not working for you?
  

    Hover over the profile pic and click the Following button to unfollow any account.
  




    Say a lot with a little
  

    When you see a Tweet you love, tap the heart — it lets  the person who wrote it know you shared the love.
  




    Spread the word
  

    The fastest way to share someone else’s Tweet with your followers is with a Retweet. Tap the icon to send it instantly.
  




    Join the conversation
  

    Add your thoughts about any Tweet with a Reply. Find a topic you’re passionate about, and jump right in.
  




    Learn the latest
  

    Get instant insight into what people are talking about now.
  




    Get more of what you love
  

    Follow more accounts to get instant updates about topics you care about.
  




    Find what's happening
  

    See the latest conversations about any topic instantly.
  




    Never miss a Moment
  

    Catch up instantly on the best stories happening as they unfold.
  



Back
Next














Next Tweet from user

























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Kathleen Sebelius: "The Product is There, The Product is Good" [Videos] - Taylor Marsh



























































































FacebookTwitterInstagramPinterestTumblrRss













homeaboutbooksblogcontact 














Previous Next 

Kathleen Sebelius: “The Product is There, The Product is Good” [Videos] 
Secretary Kathleen Sebelius talks to Dr. Sanjay Gupta.
“The interest is there.” – Secretary Kathleen Sebelius
IN THE conversation, Secretary Kathleen Sebelius she said there had been 1,100,000 calls, with “500,000 plus” accounts of people who are shopping for coverage, with monthly figures promised.  How well is it working?  
“Thousands of people have signed up… It is not where we need it to be … The good news is we have a product, we have a market, we have competitive plans, affordable prices, and no one will ever be locked out of the insurance market with a pre-existing condition and that’s good news…” – Secretary Kathleen Sebelius
In what is a stunning admission, Secretary Kathleen Sebelius said that President Obama didn’t know about the website problems before ACA launched on October 1. 
Secretary Kathleen Sebelius didn’t consider resigning, but simply doing the job she was charged to do, which she sees as the most important work of her life.  Dr. Sanjay Gupta pressed her on this topic, but resigning wasn’t something she wanted to discuss, for obvious reasons.
“Accelerating the fixes” is the first order of business.  “This will be fixed as quickly as possible,” Secretary Sebelius said, but she couldn’t give Dr. Sanjay Gupta a specific date.
“Millions of Americans want this product,” she said, which is no doubt.
A lot of people aren’t tech savvy, with “lots of people” wanting a “live body” to talk to about signing up.  This “isn’t a website, it’s about health care and about affordable plans.”  
Whether the individual mandate will be delayed is “not really the question right now,” according to Sebelius.  “You need everybody to come into the pool… we need people to sign up.”
Secretary Sebelius said at the end of the interview that she is looking to the enrollment figures at the end of March 2014, when open enrollment ends.  It sounds like that’s when we’ll know the full numbers and success of the launch of ACA.  Right as the 2014 midterms are gearing up.
I’m not sure anything Kathleen Sebelius says will change the dynamic right now, but it’s an interview she had to do, with more Administration officials needed to continue making the case.  If people don’t have confidence not enough will sign up, which will hamper the effectiveness of ACA.  
Those of us who have insurance aren’t impacted by ACA’s open enrollment period, but there are millions of uninsured who absolutely do need health care who are depending on the Obama administration delivering.  
Concerns will remain until stories from uninsured signing up and the numbers of those who getting insurance start shifting and actual numbers of those successfully enrolling are offered and confirmed.  




By Taylor Marsh|October 23rd, 2013|13 Comments 
Share This Story, Choose Your Platform!
FacebookTwitterLinkedinRedditTumblrGoogle+PinterestVkEmail 





Sort by:  
                            newest | 
                            oldest



GuestguyskiShare On TwitterShare On Google‘In what is a stunning admission, Secretary Kathleen Sebelius said that President Obama didn’t know about the website problems before ACA launched on October 1.’ No matter how this is interpreted/translated, it’s not really a stunning admission.
3 years 9 months agoGuestmjsmithShare On TwitterShare On GoogleI heard some people mention that perhaps it would be better to wait an additional year before this whole things roles out.
3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On GoogleYeah, every rightwingnut squacking head on hatemonger radio….but I know….I know…you don’t just repeat limpwithnoballs and handjobity’s talking points.
3 years 9 months agoGuestmjsmithShare On TwitterShare On GoogleWhy not look at the transcript of this interview, idiot. She even says they needed more time.
3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On Google“idiot.”
GOODNESS!!! And MY comments are in moderation?!!!!!
And I know honesty is a staple that is missing from the shelves of shop mjs but in context she does NOT say the ACA wasn’t ready…she says she wishes they had more time to do the website. But then that would require…you know…that honesty thingy.
3 years 9 months agoGuestmjsmithShare On TwitterShare On GoogleThat is my point “genius.” Even she agrees that they need more time.
3 years 9 months agoGuestBeth in suburban ChicagoShare On TwitterShare On GoogleTell the 300,000 people in Florida who have just been informed their plans are disappearing that the “product is good.” Tell the people in Chicago who are looking at much higher premiums and deductibe.s.
3 years 9 months agoGuestmjsmithShare On TwitterShare On GoogleAre you racist? Our government says people who complain about Obamacare are racist. I just got turned on to this website recently http://tinyurl.com/kd7e7zh
3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On GoogleAnother wingnut web site as a source? What a surprise!!
But if the repug/baggers want everyone to stop pointing out they are racists they should maybe lay off the confederate flag and racist references to President Obama and his family thingy.
3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On Googlehttp://herald-review.com/lifestyles/health-med-fit/7a39bfee-3a51-11e3-b3f2-001a4bcf887a.html So, the insurance companies canceling people because of pre-existing conditions or they are high medical costs is to be blamed on the ACA?! If you google 300,00 lose health insurance in Floeida you get nothing but rightwing to psycho teabagger web pages spewing this garbage. If you change the wuestion to WHY 300,000 lose health insurance in Florida you get a somewhat more…intelligent shall we say answer. Or maybe more honest answer. http://abclocal.go.com/wls/story?section=news/local/illinois&id=9260700&rss=rss-wls-article-9260700 “Tell the people in Chicago who are looking at much higher premiums and deductibe.s.” Seconds of digging turns up the truth/fact that insurance rates people will… Read more »3 years 9 months agoAdminwebmasterShare On TwitterShare On GoogleGood grief, what a deplorable spectacle masquerading as debate. Sebelius wasn’t going to make anyone happy, but she didn’t sugar coat anything, including about Obama not being told the status of how rocky things would be. Let’s not kid ourselves on delay, because can you imagine the squeals if the Admin had delayed the launch, which might not even been possible? The point is also to insure everyone, not just the haves & those w employer based health insurance. Are you all ignorant of the tens of thousands now getting coverage thru Medicaid expansion? Kentucky’s exchange has insured tens of… Read more »3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On Google“Are you all ignorant of the tens of thousands now getting coverage thru Medicaid expansion?”
No Ms. marsh….sorta my point…the product is OK, the web page is….a web page
. And what would you like as “debate”? I point out untruths and misrepresentations
from posters who have consistantly misrepresented and told untruths. How would you in a polite way of course point that out?
3 years 9 months agoGuestsecularhumanizinevoluterShare On TwitterShare On GoogleAnd as an aside….the voices these folks get their talking points from point to medicaid expansion as a failure of ACA.
3 years 9 months ago









 
 

 
 
 
 














Kathleen Sebelius - Ballotpedia















































Donate




 Elections
 Sample Ballot Lookup
 Elected Officials Lookup
 Election results
 Analysis
 2016 election analysis
 2016 election results
 Pivot counties
 Control of state government
 Competitiveness analysis
 Elections calendar
 Federal elections
 U.S. Congress special elections
 U.S. Congress elections, 2018
 State elections
 State executive
 State legislative
 State legislative special elections
 Ballot measures
 Judicial
 Local elections
 Municipal
 School board
 Local judicial
 Local measures
 Recall
 Elections by state and year
 Ballot access for candidates
 Federal
 Presidential elections
 Executive branch
 Policy issues under the Trump administration
 Presidential approval rating
 Tracking the Trump administration
 Legislative branch
 Congress
 U.S. Senate
 U.S. House
Congressional approval rating
 Judicial branch
 Supreme Court
 Supreme Court cases
 U.S. Courts of Appeals
 U.S. District Courts
 State
 State Politics
 Ballot measures
 State budgets
 State courts
 State profiles
 State legislatures
 State executive officials
 Elections by state and year
 Local
 Local ballot measures
 Notable measures
 Local measure elections
 Local courts
 Courts and judges by county
 Judicial elections
 Local elections
 Municipal government
 Largest cities
 Large counties
 Municipal elections
 Recall
 Laws governing recall
 Recall elections
 School boards
 Largest school districts
 School board elections
 Policy
 Budgets
 Civil liberties
 Education
 Elections
 Energy
 Environment
 Finance
 Healthcare
 Immigration
 Pensions
 Index
 Influencers
 National influencers
 State influencers
 Local influencers
 Election influencers
 Policy influencers
 Influencers by type
 Influencers by legal type
 Fact check
 New stories
 Federal
 State
 Local
 By date
 Submit a claim
 About fact-checking
 News
 Front page
 The Tap
 The Daily Brew
 You're Hired
 Verbatim fact check
 The Ballot Bulletin
 Pliny's Point
 Number of the Day
 Past news
 Press releases
 About
 About us
 Contact us
 Staff
 Events
 Index
 Job opportunities
 Newsletters
 Our history
 Our scope
 Partnerships
 Report an error
 Submit
 Submit a bio
 Submit a photo
 Support our work


Want to receive email updates from Ballotpedia?
			









Sign Up!


View   Print   Please log in for more tools.

Please log in to continue.



Please log in to continue.








Page contents

1 Biography
2 Career
3 Confirmation vote
4 Elections

4.1 2014
4.2 2006
4.3 Full history


5 Issues

5.1 ACA lawsuits
5.2 Meetings with Barack Obama
5.3 Healthcare.gov rollout

5.3.1 Contracting practices investigation


5.4 Rite Aid partnership
5.5 Organ transplant lists
5.6 Presidential preference
5.7 2016 presidential endorsement


6 Governorship

6.1 Abortion
6.2 Environment
6.3 Firearms
6.4 Same-sex marriage


7 Analysis

7.1 Department budget
7.2 Net worth

7.2.1 2011




8 Personal
9 Recent news
10 External links
11 Footnotes







  


Kathleen Sebelius






From Ballotpedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search




   

 This page was current at the end of the official's term in office. Please contact us with any updates.

Kathleen SebeliusFormer U.S. Secretary of Health and Human ServicesFormer officeholderTenure April 28, 2009-April 10, 2014PartyDemocraticReport an officeholder changeElections and appointmentsNominatedMarch 2, 2009ConfirmedApril 28, 2009AppointedApril 28, 2009Appointed byBarack ObamaPrior officesGovernor of Kansas2003-2009Kansas Commissioner of Insurance1995-2003Kansas State Representative1986-1994EducationHigh schoolSummit Country Day SchoolBachelor'sTrinity Washington UniversityMaster'sUniversity of KansasPersonalDate of birthMay 15, 1948Place of birthCincinatti, OhioReligionRoman CatholicHave you heard of The Tap?Click here to read the latest edition of Ballotpedia's weekly newsletter.
 
Kathleen Sebelius (b. May 15, 1948, in Cincinnati, Ohio) was formerly the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services. Sebelius was sworn into office on April 28, 2009, the same day she was confirmed by the Senate by a vote of 65-31, as the Obama administration declared a public health emergency for the swine flu.[1]  Sebelius was President Obama's second choice for the position after former Senator Tom Daschle withdrew from nomination after controversy over his tax records and field of work.[1] On April 10, 2014, Sebelius resigned following the troubled Healthcare.gov website rollout, a key feature of the Affordable Care Act. Upon her resignation, Sebelius stated that she would like to take the animosity toward the Obamacare rollout with her, explaining, "If that could just leave with me, and we could get to a new chapter, that would be terrific."[2]
She has been mentioned as a potential Democratic candidate to challenge Pat Roberts (R) for the Senate seat in Kansas in 2014.[3] On April 17, 2014, a spokeswoman for Sebelius said that she was not interested in running.[4]
Sebelius began her political career as a Kansas state legislator in 1987, and she also served Kansas as insurance commissioner and governor before becoming the Secretary of Health and Human Services.[5]  She is the daughter of former Ohio governor John Gilligan, making them the first father and daughter to hold the position of state governor.[5][6]

Biography
Born Kathleen Gilligan, Sebelius was raised in Cincinnati, Ohio, and attended the Summit Country Day School.[7] She graduated from Trinity Washington University before earning a Master of Public Administration degree from the University of Kansas.[5]

Career
Below is an abbreviated outline of Sebelius' academic, professional and political career:[5][7]

1970: Graduated from Trinity Washington University
1977: Earned Master's in Public Administration from the University of Kansas
1975-1977: Aide for the Kansas Department of Corrections
1977-1987: Director of the Kansas Trial Lawyers Association
1987-1995: Kansas state representative
1995-2003: Kansas Insurance Commissioner
2003-2009: Governor of Kansas
2009-2014: U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services
Confirmation vote
Sebelius was confirmed as the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services on April 28, 2009, by a vote of 65-31.  All dissenting votes were cast by Republican senators, while eight Republicans voted in favor of confirmation.[8]



Kathleen Sebelius confirmation vote, April 28, 2009


Party
Votes for a
Votes against d
Total votes


 Democrats 
55
0
55


 Republicans
8
31
39


 Independents
2
0
2


Total Votes
65
31
96



Elections
2014
 See also: United States Senate elections in Kansas, 2014
Sebelius has been mentioned as a potential Democratic candidate to challenge Pat Roberts (R) for the Senate seat in Kansas in 2014.[3]
On April 17, 2014, a spokeswoman for Sebelius announced that she was not interested in running for the Senate seat.[4]
“Secretary Sebelius is continuing her important work at H.H.S. and is not considering a run for the Senate,” the spokeswoman said.[4]

2006
Sebelius won re-election as Governor of Kansas on November 7, 2006, by a margin of 17.5%, defeating Jim Barnett (R), Carl Kramer (L), Richard Lee Ranzau (Reform) and Randal G. Trackwell (write-in).



Kansas Governor, 2006


Party
Candidate
Vote %
Votes

     
Democratic 
Kathleen Sebelius Incumbent
57.9%
491,993

     
Republican 
 Jim Barnett 
40.4%
343,586

     
Libertarian 
 Carl Kramer 
1%
8,896


     
Reform Party 
 Richard Lee Ranzau 
0.6%
5,221


     
Write-in 
 Randal G. Trackwell 
0%
4


Total Votes
849,700


Election results via Kansas Secretary of State


Full history
To view the full congressional electoral history for Kathleen Sebelius, click [show] to expand the section. 
2002
Sebelius was first elected as Governor of Kansas on November 5, 2002, defeating Tim Shallenburger (R), Dennis Hawver (L) and Ted Pettibone (Reform).



Kansas Governor, 2002


Party
Candidate
Vote %
Votes

     
Democratic 
Kathleen Sebelius 
52.9%
441,858

     
Republican 
 Tim Shallenburger 
45.1%
376,830

     
Libertarian 
 Dennis Hawver 
1%
8,097


     
Reform Party 
 Ted Pettibone 
1.1%
8,907


Total Votes
835,692


Election results via Kansas Secretary of State



Issues
ACA lawsuits
See also: Obamacare lawsuits
Sebelius was named in both the Sebelius v. Hobby Lobby and National Federation of Independent Business (NFIB) v. Sebelius. The NFIB case was argued in June 2012 and the law was upheld over a challenge under the Commerce Clause. That decision was 5-4.[9] Sebelius resigned prior to the Hobby Lobby decision but was in office when the case was argued by Department of Justice Solicitor General Donald Verrilli. The case was decided on June 30, 2014, in favor of Hobby Lobby. Four types of contraceptives were ruled to be exempt from employer mandated healthcare.[10]

Meetings with Barack Obama
The Government Accountability Institute found in December 2013, that between July 12, 2010, and November 30, 2013, President Obama's public schedule had no one-on-one meetings between Obama and Sebelius, who was in charge of implementing his "most important initiative." During that timeframe there were 277 meetings with other cabinet members. In response to the claim that the two had not met over that period of time, Press Secretary Jay Carney stated, "Cabinet secretaries don’t regularly get entered into the visitor logs."[11] A Department spokesperson backed up Carney's statements, claiming, "She is frequently at the White House for meetings related to the implementation of the Affordable Care Act, including dozens with the President in the last year alone. In fact, she met with the President just yesterday."[12]
The Hill released the findings of a Freedom of Information Act request on February 13, 2014, showing evidence of 18 meetings between October 2012 and October 2013. Seven of those meetings were specifically on the topic of Obamacare. When questioned by the news outlet on why President Obama was not aware of the website problems, a HHS Department spokesperson responded, "She is frequently at the White House for meetings on a wide range of topics, including the implementation of the Affordable Care Act. As we have also said, the Affordable Care Act is more than just a website, and consistent with other significant policy initiatives, there was coordination across the Administration on a broad range of policy and implementation topics."[13]

Healthcare.gov rollout
 See also: Healthcare.gov website rollout



Pat Roberts calls for Sebelius' resignation.

The launch of the Healthcare.gov website featuring the federal healthcare exchanges created by the Affordable Care Act was met with error messages, faulty information being sent to insurers and problems with direct enrollment through insurance companies.[14][15][16] At an October 10, 2013, promotional event for the website, Sebelius stated, "Believe me, we had some early glitches, but it's getting better every day."[17] Sen. Pat Roberts called for Sebelius' resignation over the struggling website on October 11, stating,  "Enough is enough. Today I am calling on Kathleen Sebelius to resign her post as Secretary of Health and Human Services.  Secretary Sebelius has had three and a half years to launch Obamacare, and she has failed."[18] Sebelius testified before the House Energy and Commerce committee on October 30, 2013. During testimony, Sebelius stated: "In these early weeks, access to HealthCare.gov has been a miserably frustrating experience for way too many Americans, including many who have waited years, in some cases their entire lives, for the security of health insurance."[19][20] Officials have not released an estimated timeframe for fixes.[21]
On October 23, Rep. Jeanne Shaheen, (D-NH) called for an extension of the open enrollment period while the administration attempted to fix the problems, while Sen. Joe Manchin, (D-WV) was already drafting a bill to delay the individual mandate for a year.[22]

Contracting practices investigation
On December 11, 2013, Sebelius asked the inspector general of the Health and Human Services Department to open an investigation into the contracting practices involved in the Healthcare.gov website. She said the investigation's results would help to prevent future issues like happened with the website rollout.  She also announced the creation of a chief risk officer position in the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.[23]

Rite Aid partnership
On September 9, 2013, Sebelius announced a partnership with Rite Aid to promote the Affordable Care Act throughout the country.  The company promised to place insurance agents at 2,000 of the chain's 4,600 locations nationwide.  Agents are not to be affiliated with the insurers offering new exchanges, but they do receive commission on each policy taken out.  Rite Aid also receives a commission per policy.  Sebelius commented on the agreement, stating, "We weren't ever going to make this program work from Washington. This has to be an on-the-ground effort. Americans trust their pharmacists. Often the pharmacist is the on-the-ground health provider people see the most and know the best, so having this critical role in a pharmacy makes wonderful sense."
Steve Lonegan, a New Jersey candidate for U.S. Senate, spoke out against the agreement, stating, "If Rite Aid and the other big companies are so enthusiastic and think this is such a great plan, let it stand on its own two feet."[24]

Organ transplant lists
In late May 2013, Sebelius was involved in debate over transplant lines for adult lungs. Policy requires that children under 12 in need of a lung transplant be placed at the bottom of the waiting list for adult lungs, while being placed at the top of the transplant list of children's lungs, though they are more rare.  Ten year-old Sarah Murnaghan of Pennsylvania was in need of a lung transplant due to cystic fibrosis. She had been on the pediatric lung transplant list for 18 months. Sebelius ordered a review of the policy, but stated she "can't imagine anything worse than one individual getting to pick who lives and who dies."[25]  On June 5, 2013, a federal judge ordered Sebelius to allow Murnaghan to be added to the adult lung transplant list, giving her a higher probability of receiving a transplant, after hearing oral arguments in a lawsuit filed by Murnaghan's parents. A change to the policy would allow about 20 children annually to be added to the adult waiting list consisting of 1,600 patients. Dr. Arthur Caplan of the New York University Langone Medical Center explained that the reasoning behind the policy is that children generally fair worse than adults after the procedure. Caplan worried that the precedent set by the court ruling could result in politicizing medical judgements.[26]

Presidential preference
2016 presidential endorsement
✓ Sebelius endorsed Hillary Clinton for the Democratic primary in the 2016 U.S. presidential election.[27]

See also: Endorsements for Hillary Clinton


 2016 Presidential Endorsements by Influencer Individuals


 Name

 Candidate

 Date

 Source


  Colin Powell 
  Hillary Clinton 
 October 2016 
 Newsday


  DeRay McKesson 
  Hillary Clinton 
 October 2016 
 The Washington Post


  Michael Chertoff 
  Hillary Clinton 
 October 2016 
 Bloomberg.com


  Larry Pressler 
  Hillary Clinton 
 August 2016 
 The Hill


  George P. Bush 
  Donald Trump 
 August 2016 
 CNN


  Michael Bloomberg 
  Hillary Clinton 
 July 2016 
 The Hill


  Jesse Ventura 
  Gary Johnson 
 July 2016 
 CNBC


  William G. Milliken 
  Hillary Clinton 
 August 2016 
 Detroit Free Press


  Meg Whitman 
  Hillary Clinton 
 August 2016 
 Reuters


  Al Gore 
  Hillary Clinton 
 July 2016 
 CNN


  Jeff DeWit 
  Donald Trump 
 January 2016 
 The Arizona Republic


  Joe Biden 
  Hillary Clinton 
 June 2016 
 Politico


  Barack Obama 
  Hillary Clinton 
 June 2016 
 CNN


  Newt Gingrich 
  Donald Trump 
 May 2016 
 CBS News


  Roger F. Villere Jr. 
  Donald Trump 
 May 2016 
 Republican Party of Louisiana


  Steve Beshear 
  Hillary Clinton 
 May 2016 
 The Courier-Journal


  Sheldon Adelson 
  Donald Trump 
 May 2016 
 Politico


  Kathleen Sebelius 
  Hillary Clinton 
 February 2016 
 CBS News


  Scott Brown 
  Donald Trump 
 February 2016 
 Boston Herald


  Lincoln Almond 
  Jeb Bush 
 January 2016 
 Bloomberg


  Ann Marie Buerkle 
  Carly Fiorina 
 November 2015 
 Syracuse.com


  Eric Holder 
  Hillary Clinton 
 January 2016 
 Politico


  Tony Perkins 
  Ted Cruz 
 January 2016 
 The Huffington Post


  Jon Kyl 
  Marco Rubio 
 January 2016 
 The Arizona Republic


  Norm Coleman 
  Jeb Bush 
 January 2016 
 Minnesota Public Radio


  Lucy Flores 
  Bernie Sanders 
 November 2015 
 Cleveland.com


  Sarah Palin 
  Donald Trump 
 January 2016 
 The New York Times


  Eric Cantor 
  Jeb Bush 
 November 2015 
 CNN


  Brian Schweitzer 
  Martin O'Malley 
 October 2015 
 CNN Politics


  Nina Turner 
  Bernie Sanders 
 November 2015 
 Cleveland.com


  Gabrielle Giffords 
  Hillary Clinton 
 January 2016 
 CNN


  Peter Bragdon 
  Chris Christie 
 January 2016 
 New Hampshire Union Leader


  Bob Vander Plaats 
  Ted Cruz 
 December 2015 
 ABC News


  Paul Singer 
  Marco Rubio 
 October 2015 
 The New York Times


  Frank VanderSloot 
  Marco Rubio 
 November 2015 
 Politico


  Kenneth Griffin 
  Marco Rubio 
 December 2015 
 The New York Times


  Julian Castro 
  Hillary Clinton 
 October 2015 
 MSNBC


  Tom Vilsack 
  Hillary Clinton 
 August 2015 
 MSNBC


  Tom Perez 
  Hillary Clinton 
 December 2015 
 Politico


  Peter Franchot 
  Hillary Clinton 
 October 2015 
 Baltimore Sun



Governorship
Abortion
Sebelius vetoed legislation tightening the requirements and authorizing lawsuits against providers of late term abortions in 2009, just prior to filling the office of U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services, as well as vetoing similar bills in 2008, 2007, 2006, 2005 and 2003.[28][29]

Environment
Sebelius held the environment as a high priority while governor.  She established Kansas "Green Teams" in 2005, aiming to encourage state employees recycle, cut down on waste and use environmentally friendly products.  As part of a joint effort, the Kansas Department of Health and Environment launched the "Get Caught Recycling!" contest in 2006.[30]
In 2008, Sebelius vetoed legislation intended to overturn the administration's rejection of permits for two coal-fired power plants in western Kansas.  Proponents of the legislation claimed that vetoing the bill would mean higher energy costs for Kansans.[31]  Months later, Sebelius called for a stronger federal commitment to renewable energy sources while speaking at an American Wind Energy Association conference.[32]

Firearms
Sebelius vetoed concealed carry laws in 2004 and 2006, claiming, "While every law-abiding Kansan has a right to keep and bear arms, hidden weapons make it harder for law enforcement to do it's job, and they make Kansas' workplaces less safe."[33][34]
In 2008, Sebelius signed into law a bill legalizing the possession of fully automatic weapons, which had been banned since 1933.  The bill mainly benefited collectors and dealers delivering weapons to law enforcement agencies.[35]

Same-sex marriage
Sebelius did not support an April 2005 amendment to the Kansas Constitution that made same-sex marriage in the state unconstitutional. Sebelius said she supported the existing state law outlawing same-sex marriage, viewed it as sufficient, and therefore opposed the constitutional amendment. The amendment passed with 69 percent voter approval.[36]

Analysis
Department budget
U.S. Department of Health and Human Services[37] Annual Budget YearBudget (in billions)% Difference from previous year2014$967.36.55%2013$907.87.03%2012$848.2-4.84%2011$891.34.34%2010$854.27.55%2009$794.2N/A

Note: 2014 only represents the Department's budget request, not an enacted budget.
Net worth
 See also: Changes in Net Worth of U.S. Senators and Representatives (Personal Gain Index) and Net worth of United States Senators and Representatives
2011
Based on congressional financial disclosure forms and calculations made available by OpenSecrets.org, Sebelius' net worth as of 2011 was estimated between $502,004.00 and $4,864,998.00. That averages to $2,683,501.00, which ranks 17th among executive branch members.[38]

Personal
She is married to Gary Sebelius, a federal magistrate judge, with whom she has two sons.[5]

Recent news
This section displays the most recent stories in a Google news search for the term Kathleen + Sebelius + Secretary + Health + Human + Services



Kathleen Sebelius News Feed

Loading...

External links

Social media:
Twitter
Biographies:
NNDB
Wikipedia
Political profiles:
 Project Vote Smart
Fact-checking:
 PolitiFact
Financial (federal level):
 OpenSecrets.org
 LegiStorm.com
Interest group ratings:
 Project Vote Smart
Issue positions:
 On The Issues
 Project Vote Smart
Public statements:
 Project Vote Smart
Voting record:
 Project Vote Smart
Works by or about:
 WorldCat
Media appearances:
 IMDb
Media coverage:
  Bloomberg
  New York Times
  Washington Post


Footnotes


↑ 1.0 1.1 CNN, "Sebelius sworn in as Health and Human Services secretary," April 28, 2009

↑ New York Times, "Health Secretary Resigns After Woes of HealthCare.gov," April 10, 2014

↑ 3.0 3.1 NY Times, "Sebelius Said to Weigh Run for Kansas Senate Seat," accessed April 16, 2014

↑ 4.0 4.1 4.2 NY Times, "Sebelius Says She’s Not Interested in Senate Run," accessed April 21, 2014

↑ 5.0 5.1 5.2 5.3 5.4 U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, "Biography: HHS Secretary," accessed June 7, 2013

↑ Governing, "Former Ohio Gov. Gilligan Dies," August 27, 2013

↑ 7.0 7.1 Biography.com, "Kathleen Sebelius biography," accessed June 6, 2013

↑ GovTrack, "On the Nomination," April 28, 2013

↑ Christian-Science Monitor, "How John Roberts upheld health-care law while limiting congressional power," June 28, 2012

↑ Christian-Science Monitor, "Hobby Lobby 101: explaining the Supreme Court's birth control ruling," July 10, 2014

↑ Politico, "When Barry Met Kathy," December 5, 2013

↑ Politico, "Jay Carney pushes back on Kathleen Sebelius report," December 6, 2013

↑ The Hill, "Before O-Care debacle, Sebelius made many trips to White House," February 13, 2014

↑ Chicago Tribune, "Computer glitches, overloads hit health care exchanges," October 1, 2013

↑ Bloomberg, "Insurers Getting Faulty Data From U.S. Health Exchanges," October 8, 2013

↑ Politico, "Another obstacle to signing up for ACA crops up," October 21, 2013

↑ Pittsburgh Tribune-Review, "Sebelius visit fails to reassure as health care website glitches persist," October 10, 2013

↑ Youtube, "Senator Roberts Call For Secretary Sebelius to Resign," October 11, 2013

↑ CNN, "Sebelius: 'I apologize, I'm accountable' for Obamacare website flaws," October 30, 2013

↑ Politico, "Kathleen Sebelius offers to testify on Obamacare," October 22, 2013

↑ Politico, "Tech 'surge' to tackle Obamacare websites," October 20, 2013

↑ NBC News, "Obama administration clarifies dates related to health care rollout," October 23, 2013

↑ Wall Street Journal, "Sebelius Calls for Review of Healthcare.gov Contracting Practices," December 11, 2013

↑ ABC News, "Kathleen Sebelius launches ObamaCare effort with Rite Aid in New Jersey," September 9, 2013

↑ Politico, "Kathleen Sebelius at center of storm over child's lung transplant," June 4, 2013

↑ Fox News, "Dying girl intubated as she awaits lung transplant," June 10, 2013

↑ CBS News, "Ex-HHS Sec. Kathleen Sebelius endorses Hillary Clinton," February 22, 2016

↑ New York Daily News, "Kansas Gov. Sebelius vetoes bill on late-term abortions; US Health and Human Services Sect. bid hurt," April 24, 2009

↑ Rasmussen Reports, "A Vice President for Abortion," May 26, 2008

↑ Project Vote Smart, "Sebelius Encourages State Workers to Get Caught Recycling!" July 22, 2006

↑ Environment News Service, "Kansas Governor Rejects Two Coal-Fired Power Plants," March 21, 2008

↑ Lawrence Journal-World, "Sebelius calls on feds to step up development of wind energy," June 2, 2008

↑ USA Today, "Kan. governor vetoes concealed weapons bill," April 16, 2004

↑ Daily Kos, "KS Gov Sebelius (D) Vetoes Conceal Carry," March 22, 2006

↑ Lawrence Journal-World, "Sebelius signs machine gun bill," April 22, 2008

↑ Boston Globe, "Kansans vote to ban same-sex marriage," April 6, 2005

↑ U.S. Department of Health and Human Services, "Budget and Performance," accessed January 31, 2014

↑ OpenSecrets, "Kathleen Sebelius, 2011," accessed June 11, 2013




 Political offices


Preceded byMike Leavitt

U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services2009-2014

 Succeeded bySylvia Mathews Burwell


Preceded byBill Graves

Governor of Kansas2003-2009

 Succeeded byMark Parkinson


Preceded byRonald Todd

Kansas Insurance Commissioner1995-2003

 Succeeded bySandy Praeger





v • eState of KansasTopeka (capital)Ballot Measures

List of Kansas ballot measures |
Local ballot measures |
School bond issues |
Ballot measure laws |
Campaign Finance Requirements |
Recall process |

Government

Kansas State Constitution |
House of Representatives |
Senate |
Governmental Ethics Commission |
Legislative Post-Auditor |

State executive officers

Governor |
Lieutenant Governor |
Attorney General |
Secretary of State |
Treasurer |
Commissioner of Education |
Commissioner of Insurance |
Secretary of Agriculture |
Secretary of Wildlife and Parks |
Secretary of Labor |
Corporation Commission |

School boards

Kansas State Department of Education |
Kansas school districts |

Judiciary

Kansas Supreme Court |
Court of Appeals |
District Courts |
Judicial selection in Kansas |

Transparency Topics

Open Records Act |
Transparency Checklist |
Transparency Legislation |
Transparency Advocates |
State budget |
Taxpayer-funded lobbying associations |

Divisions

List of Counties |
List of Cities |
List of School Districts |
Evaluation of county websites |
Evaluation of city websites |
Evaluation of school district websites |


v • eKansas' current delegation to the United States CongressSenatorsJerry Moran (R) • Pat Roberts (R) RepresentativesKevin Yoder (R) • Lynn Jenkins (R) • Ron Estes (R) • Roger Marshall (R) Other states' delegationsAlabama • Alaska • Arizona • Arkansas • California • Colorado • Connecticut • Delaware • Florida • Georgia • Hawaii • Idaho • Illinois • Indiana • Iowa • Kansas • Kentucky • Louisiana • Maine • Maryland • Massachusetts • Michigan • Minnesota • Mississippi • Missouri • Montana • Nebraska • Nevada • New Hampshire • New Jersey • New Mexico • New York • North Carolina • North Dakota • Ohio • Oklahoma • Oregon • Pennsylvania • Rhode Island • South Carolina • South Dakota • Tennessee • Texas • Utah • Vermont • Virginia • Washington • West Virginia • Wisconsin • Wyoming 
v • eU.S. Executive BranchElected officesPresident of the United States • Vice President of the United States Executive departmentsDepartment of Defense • Department of State • Department of Homeland Security • Department of Justice • Department of Commerce • Department of Education • Department of the Treasury • Department of Agriculture • Department of Energy • Department of Labor • Department of Transportation • Department of the Interior • Department of Health and Human Services • Department of Veterans Affairs • Department of Housing and Urban Development Cabinet-level officesEnvironmental Protection Agency • Office of Management and Budget • U.S. Mission to the United Nations • Council of Economic Advisors • Small Business Administration • White House Chief of StaffFederally appointed officesFederal Reserve System • National Security Advisor • White House Press Secretary • U.S. Postmaster General • Central Intelligence Agency • Federal Bureau of Investigation • Internal Revenue Service • Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives • National Security Agency • Congressional Budget Office • Federal Election Commission • Transportation Security Administration • Drug Enforcement Administration • Federal Communications CommissionElected officialsDonald Trump • Mike PenceGlossaryAppointment confirmation process • United States Constitution • Electoral College • Deferred action • Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) • Deferred Action for Parents of U.S. Citizens and Lawful Permanent Residents (DAPA) • Impeachments of federal officials • Investor-State Dispute Settlement (ISDS) • North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA) • P5+1 and E3+3 • Trade adjustment assistance (TAA) • Trade promotion authority (TPA)



 
				Retrieved from "https://ballotpedia.org/wiki/index.php?title=Kathleen_Sebelius&oldid=6532380"				
Categories: Hillary Clinton endorsements by influencer individuals, 2016U.S. secretaries of health and human servicesFormer Kansas governorFormer Democratic governorApril 2009 confirmation pagesFederal appointments, Obama administration 




























 


 This page was last modified on 18 November 2016, at 11:30.
Content is available under GNU Free Documentation License 1.2 unless otherwise noted.


Privacy policy
About Ballotpedia
Disclaimers
Mobile view
Feedback
Permalink
Log in




Ballotpedia includes 257,227 encyclopedic articles written and curated by our professional staff of editors, writers, and researchers. To contact our editorial staff, click here. To report an error, click here. For media inquiries, you can reach us here. To support our continued expansion, please contact us here.





The Tap[edit]
 Ballotpedia wants to keep you in the know. In our weekly newsletter, The Tap, we let you know the important things that happened last week, and what you should look for this week. Click here to check out this week's edition.


Executive Branch[edit]
 Executive Branch
 2016 Presidential Election
 Federal Officials
 U.S. Executive Departments
 Issues by Administration
 Issues by Topic


U.S. Congress[edit]
 Congress
 Incumbents
 115th Congress
 U.S. Senate
 U.S. House of Representatives
 Committees in Congress
 United States Congress Elections, 2018


State Executives[edit]
 State Executive Officials
 State Executive Offices
 State Trifectas
 State of the State Addresses
 Irregular Office Changes
 State Executive Official Elections, 2017


State Legislatures[edit]
 State Legislatures
 List of State Legislatures
 Who Runs the States
 Competitiveness Analysis
 State Legislative Elections, 2017
 Redistricting


Ballot Measures[edit]
 State Ballot Measures
 Ballot Measures by State
 Ballot Measures by Topic
 State Ballot Measures, 2017
 Local Ballot Measures
 Local Ballot Measures, 2017
 Recall


School Boards[edit]
 School Boards
 Largest School Districts by Enrollment
 List of School Districts
 School District Spending
 School Board Elections, 2017


Municipal Government[edit]
 Municipal Government
 100 Largest Cities by Population
 List of Current City Council Officials
 United States Municipal Elections, 2017


Elections[edit]
 Elections
 Sample Ballot Lookup
 Elected Officials Lookup
 Election Calendar
 Voting Laws by State
 Ballot Access for Candidates
 Elections by State and Year


Public Policy[edit]
 Public Policy
 Budgets
 Civil Liberties
 Education
 Elections
 Energy
 Environment
 Healthcare
 Pensions


Federal Courts[edit]
 Judicial Branch
 Federal Courts
 Supreme Court
 The Federal Vacancy Count
 Major Cases of the Supreme Court
 Nominations by President


State Courts[edit]
 State Courts
 Courts by State
 Courts by County
 Judicial Elections
 Judicial Selection
 Appointments by Governor


Influencers[edit]
 Influencers
 National Influencers
 State Influencers
 Local Influencers
 Election Influencers
 Policy Influencers
 Influencers by Type
 Influencers by Legal Type


Verbatim[edit]
 Verbatim
 Verbatim Top Stories
 Federal
 State
 Local
 About Fact-Checking


Help Pages[edit]
 Index of Contents
 Index of Help Contents
 Ballotpedia Policies
 General Disclaimer
 Report an error


Community[edit]
 How to Contribute to Ballotpedia
 Ways You Can Help
 Job Opportunities
 Partnering With Ballotpedia
 Amazon Affiliate


About/Contact[edit]
 About Ballotpedia
 Scope of Ballotpedia
 The Lucy Burns Institute
 Ballotpedia Staff
 Press and Media
 For the Media
 Contact Us
 Submit a Bio


News[edit]
 The Tap
 The Daily Brew
 The Ballotpedia News Update


 














Issa Subpoenas HHS Secretary Sebelius for HealthCare.gov Documents - United States House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform





















































































 




Press Release













Issa Subpoenas HHS Secretary Sebelius for HealthCare.gov Documents

Published: Oct 31, 2013










Share via Email




WASHINGTON – Today, House Oversight and Government Reform Committee Chairman Darrell Issa, R-Calif., announced he has subpoenaed Health and Human Services Secretary Kathleen Sebelius for documents related to the troubled launch of HealthCare.gov, which so far the department has refused to provide.
“The Administration’s failure to provide answers about what led to the disastrous launch of HealthCare.gov and what is being done to fix it is completely unacceptable,” Chairman Issa said. “The evidence is mounting that the website did not go through proper testing, including critical security testing, and that the Administration ignored repeated warnings from contractors about ongoing problems.
“The American people deserve to know why the Administration spent significant taxpayer money on a product that is entirely dysfunctional and puts their personal information at risk. The website, however, is just the beginning of the problems with the health care law. ObamaCare is the president’s signature legislative achievement, and it’s given us skyrocketing out-of-pocket costs, fewer choices, and the cancellation of millions of people’s current health insurance coverage, directly contradicting the president’s promise that if you like your existing health insurance, you can keep it,” Chairman Issa said.
The subpoena requires HHS to produce documents related to technical problems with HealthCare.gov, the testing that went into the website and the number of people who have enrolled and attempted to enroll in federal exchanges through HealthCare.gov by 12:00 p.m. on November 13, 2013.
The document request was originally made in an October 10th letter co-signed by Chairman Issa and Senator Lamar Alexander, R-Tenn., and reiterated in an October 24th letter that raised the possibility of a subpoena.
 









Share via Email






Related Updates




Press Release
Chaffetz Statement on Selection of Gowdy as Oversight Chair



 



Press Release
Committee Releases Fast & Furious Report: Obstruction of Congress by the Department of Justice



 



Press Release
Chaffetz Responds to FBI Letter Regarding Comey Memos



 



Press Release
House Passes Two Oversight Committee Bills



 












